 “Now we have four-month-old mice that no longer have diabetes,” he added.
 According to a warning by Dr. Ehud Ur, a professor of medicine at Dalhousie University in Halifax, Nova Scotia, and chair of the Canadian Diabetes Association's Clinical and Scientific Department, the research is still in its early stages.
 Like some other experts, he doubts that diabetes is curable, noting that these findings do not apply to people who already have type 1 diabetes.
 On Monday, Sara Danius, permanent secretary of the Nobel Committee on Literature at the Swedish Academy, publicly stated on a Swedish radio station Sveriges that the committee, which failed to contact Bob Dylan directly to inform him that he had won the 2016 Nobel Prize in Literature, is giving up on trying to reach him.
 Danius said: "We are not doing anything now. I have called and emailed his closest collaborator and got very friendly replies. For now, that is enough."
 Earlier, Ring CEO Jamie Siminoff noted that this company began with the fact that he did not hear the doorbell in his garage workshop.
 He said he created a doorbell that works off WiFi.
 Siminoff said sales grew after his appearance on the 2013 episode of the show “Shark Tank,” where the panel of judges declined to fund his startup.
 In late 2017, Siminoff appeared on the home shopping channel QVC.
 In addition, Ring settled a lawsuit with competitors, the security firm ADT Corporation.
 Although an experimental vaccine has been found to reduce mortality from Ebola, no drug has yet shown clear effectiveness in treating existing infection.
 The ZMapp antibody cocktail initially showed promising results in this area, but official studies have shown that it has less benefit in preventing death than previously expected.
 In the PALM trial, ZMapp served as a control, meaning researchers used it as a baseline and compared it to three other treatment options.
 The USA Gymnastics Federation supports the letter from the US Olympic Committee and agrees with the absolute necessity of creating a safe environment for all our athletes.
 We agree with the USOC statement that it is in the best interests of our athletes, clubs, and their sports to reform our organization from within rather than to have our certification revoked.
 USA Gymnastics supports an independent investigation that could shed light on how the abuse described so bravely by survivors of Larry Nassar could have gone on for so long undetected, and supports all necessary and appropriate changes.
 The U.S. Gymnastics Federation and the U.S. Olympic Committee have the same goal — to make gymnastics and other sports as safe as possible for athletes so they can pursue their goals in a safe, positive environment and be empowered.
 In the 1960s, Brzezinski held the position of adviser to John F. Kennedy, then in the administration of Lyndon B. Johnson.
 During the 1976 election, he advised Carter on foreign policy. Then from 1977 to 1981, he served as national security adviser, succeeding Henry Kissinger.
 As a national security adviser, he helped Carter in world diplomacy, for example, in the conclusion of the Camp David agreements of 1978, the normalization of US-Chinese relations in the late 1970s, the development of policy towards the Iranian revolution, which led to the hostage crisis in 1979, and the invasion of the USSR in Afghanistan in 1979.
 This film starring Ryan Gosling and Emma Stone received nominations in all the major categories.
 Gosling and Stone were nominated for Best Actor and Best Actress, respectively.
 Other nominations include: "Best Picture", "Director", "Cinematography", "Costume Design", "Film Editing", "Original Music", "Production Design", "Sound Editing", "Sound" and "Original Screenplay".
 Two songs from the film — Audition (The Fools Who Dream) and City of Stars — were nominated for Best Original Song, and Lionsgate was nominated in 26 categories — more than any other studio.
 Late Sunday night, US President Donald Trump, through a press secretary, said that US troops would leave Syria.
 The statement came after Trump held a telephone conversation with Turkish President Recep Tayyip Erdogan.
 In addition, Turkey will play a major role in the protection of captured ISIS fighters, whom, according to the statement, European countries have refused to return home.
 This not only confirms that at least some dinosaurs had feathers, which is already a widely accepted theory, but also provides details that can’t usually be gleaned from fossil remains, such as color and three-dimensional structure.
 Scientists say that the plumage of this animal was above chestnut-brown color, and below - either pale, or had carotenoid pigmentation.
 The find also allows to get acquainted with the evolution of feathers in birds.
 Since dinosaur feathers lack a well-developed rachis, but still have other distinctive features — beards and whiskers — the researchers concluded that the rachis probably appeared later through the evolutionary development of other distinctive features.
 The structure of the feathers suggests that they were not used for flight, but rather for temperature regulation and display. Researchers suggested that although this is a young dinosaur tail, the sample represents an adult plumage, not a chicken down.
 The researchers suggested that, despite the fact that this is the tail of a young dinosaur, this specimen has the plumage of an adult individual, and not the down of a chicken.
 Yesterday morning, a car bomb exploded near the main police headquarters in Gaziantep (Turkey), killing 2 police officers and injuring more than 20 people.
 The governor's office said 19 of the wounded were police officers.
 Police said the attack was carried out by a suspected ISIS militant.
 They found that the Sun works on the same basic principles as other stars: it was found that the activity of all stars in the system is determined by their brightness, rotation and nothing else.
 The combination of luminosity and rotation is used to determine the Rossby number of the star, which is related to the plasma flow.
 The smaller the Rossby number, the less active the star is with respect to magnetic field inversions.
 Iwasaki often found himself in unpleasant situations during his travels.
 He was robbed by pirates, attacked by a rabid dog in Tibet, escaped a wedding in Nepal and was arrested in India.
 The 802.11n standard operates on both frequencies – 2.4 GHz and 5.0 GHz.
 This will provide backward compatibility with 802.11a, 802.11b and 802.11g, provided that the base station has a dual receiver.
 802.11n speeds are significantly faster than its predecessors with a maximum theoretical throughput of 600 Mbps.
 Duval, who is married and has two teenage children, did not make a big impression on Miller, who was told the story.
 When Miller was asked for comment, he said, "Mike talks a lot during hearings... I was preparing, so I didn't really listen to what he was saying."
 "We will make efforts to significantly reduce carbon dioxide emissions per unit of GDP by 2020 compared with the 2005 level," Hu said.
 He did not give a figure for budget cuts, saying they would be made based on China's economic performance.
 Hu urged developing countries to "avoid the old pattern of polluting first and then cleaning up".
 He added that "they should not be asked to commit themselves to undertakings that go beyond their stage of development, responsibilities and capabilities."
 At 12:00 GMT today, the Iraq Study Group presented its report.
 He warns: "No one can guarantee that any plan of action in Iraq in the current situation can stop the religious war, growing violence or impending chaos."
 The report opens with a call for open debate and consensus-building in the United States on Middle East policy.
 The report is a scathing critique of almost every aspect of the current executive branch policy toward Iraq and an urgent call for an immediate change of course.
 The first of the 78 recommendations is that a new diplomatic initiative should be implemented before the end of this year to strengthen Iraq's borders to prevent hostile interference, and to resume diplomatic relations with its neighbors.
 Current senator and Argentina's first lady Cristina Fernandez de Kirchner announced her candidacy for president last night in La Plata, a city 50 kilometers (31 miles) from Buenos Aires.
 Ms Kirchner announced her intention to run for president at the Argentine theatre, the same place where she launched her 2005 Senate campaign as a member of the Buenos Aires province delegation.
 The debate was sparked by disagreements over the cost of providing material support and rebuilding buildings after Hurricane Katrina, which some fiscal conservatives jokingly called the "New Orleans Bush deal."
 Liberal criticism of the reconstruction effort focused on the fact that the contracts for the reconstruction work were allegedly given to companies with connections to the government.
 More than four million people traveled to Rome to attend the funeral.
 The number of people present was so great that not everyone could get to St. Peter's Square, where the funeral was held.
 Large television screens were set up in various places in Rome, through which people could watch the ceremony.
 Similar events, which were attended by large numbers of people, were organized in many other Italian cities and in the rest of the world, in particular in Poland.
 Historians criticize the FBI's past policy of devoting most of its resources to easily solved cases, especially car thefts, in order to boost the agency's success rate.
 Congress began funding the initiative to combat pornography in 2005 fiscal year and determined that the FBI should allocate 10 agents to combat adult pornography.
 Robin Utthappa scored a record number of runs in the innings: 70 runs for only 41 pitch, hit 11 fours and 2 sixes.
 Middle order batsmen Sachin Tendulkar and Rahul Dravid performed well and earned a hundred-run partnership.
 However, after losing the captain's caliper, India made only 36 runs, losing 7 calipers to complete innings.
 US President George W. Bush arrived in Singapore on the morning of November 16, beginning his week-long tour of Asia.
 He was welcomed by Singapore Deputy Prime Minister Wong Kan Seng. He then discussed trade and terrorism issues with Singapore Prime Minister Lee Hsien Loong.
 A week after the midterm election defeats, Bush announced to the public an expansion of trade with Asia.
 Prime Minister Stephen Harper agreed to send the Clean Air Act to a caucus meeting before second reading, following a 25-minute meeting with NDP Leader Jack Layton at the PMO on Tuesday.
 At a meeting with Prime Minister Leighton asked to make changes and "rewrite" the environmental bill of the Conservative party.
 Since the federal government intervened and took over the funding of the Mersey Community Hospital in Devonport (Tasmania), the state government and some members of the federal parliament have criticised the move as a ploy ahead of the federal election due in November.
 But Prime Minister John Howard said it was done only to protect the hospital from a cut in funding by the Tasmanian government by providing an extra A$45 million.
 According to the latest bulletin, sea level observations indicated an approaching tsunami, and clear seismic activity was recorded near Pago Pago and Niue.
 Tonga reported no major damage or casualties, but there was a temporary power outage, which reportedly prevented Tonga’s authorities from receiving a tsunami warning sent by the Pacific Tsunami Warning Center (PTWC).
 Fourteen schools in Hawaii, located on or near the coast, were closed Wednesday despite the cancellation of warnings.
 US President George W. Bush welcomed the announcement.
 Bush spokesman Gordon Johndroe called the North Korean pledge "a big step toward the goal of verifiable nuclear disarmament of the Korean peninsula."
 Today in the Atlantic Ocean formed a subtropical cyclone Jerry, this is the tenth cyclone named this season in the Atlantic hurricane.
 According to the National Hurricane Center, at this time, Jerry poses no threat on land.
 According to the chief of the U.S. Army Corps of Engineers, 6 inches of rain could have breached the damaged levees.
 The Ninth Ward, flooded 20 feet during Hurricane Katrina, is now underwater as a nearby levee proved insufficient to hold back the water.
 Water is spilling over the dam at a 100-foot-wide section.
 Commons administrator Adam Kerdan expressed his frustration over deletions in his talk last month with Wikinews.
 “He [Wales] essentially lied to us from the beginning, first by acting as if this was necessary for legal reasons, and second by pretending to listen to us up until his removal of the images.”
 Public outrage has led to the current effort to develop a content policy for the site, which hosts millions of openly licensed media files.
 The work was mainly theoretical, but the program was written to simulate observations of the galaxy in Sagittarius.
 The effect the team was looking for could be caused by tidal forces between the dark matter in the galaxy and the dark matter in the Milky Way.
 Just as the Moon attracts the Earth, causing tides, so the Milky Way affects the galaxy in Sagittarius.
 Scientists were able to conclude that dark matter affects other dark matter in the same way as ordinary matter.
 According to this theory, a significant part of the dark matter around the Galaxy is in the form of an halo and consists of a large number of small particles.
 Television reports say there is white smoke coming from the plant.
 Local authorities warn residents living near the station to stay indoors, turn off air conditioners and not drink tap water.
 According to Japan's Nuclear Regulation Authority, the plant was found to have radioactive cesium and iodine.
 Authorities suspect that this indicates a possible breach and leakage in the uranium fuel containers on the site.
 In the course of research in the South African region of KwaZulu-Natal, Dr. Tony Moll was able to detect tuberculosis with exceptionally high resistance to drugs (XDR-TB).
 In an interview, he said the new strain "raises very big concerns because it leads to very high mortality".
 Some patients may have been infected in the hospital, Dr. Moll thinks, and at least two were health care workers at the hospital.
 In one year, an infected person can infect 10 to 15 people in close contact.
 However, the percentage of people with multidrug-resistant tuberculosis in the whole group of tuberculosis patients still seems low; 6000 out of a total of 330 000 infected at this particular moment in South Africa.
 The satellites, each weighing more than 1,000 pounds and traveling at a speed of about 17,500 miles per hour, collided at an altitude of 491 miles above the Earth's surface.
 Scientists say the explosion caused by the collision was very powerful.
 They are still trying to determine how big the collision was and how much the Earth will be affected.
 The U.S. Strategic Command is searching for debris.
 The results of the analysis of the graphs will be posted on a public website.
 Murder charges will be filed against a doctor who worked at the Children's Hospital of Pittsburgh, Pennsylvania, after her mother was found dead in the trunk of her car on Wednesday, Ohio authorities said.
 Dr. Malar Balasubramanian, 29, was found in Blue Ash, Ohio, a suburb about 15 miles north of Cincinnati, lying on the ground in a T-shirt and underwear and apparently in the grip of a powerful drug-induced stupor.
 She sent officers to her black Oldsmobile Intrigue, which was 500 feet away.
 There they found the body of 53-year-old Sarodji Balasubramaniam, covered in blood-soaked blankets.
 Police said the body had probably been there for about a day.
 The first cases of the disease this season were reported in July.
 The carriers are pigs, from which the disease is then transmitted to humans through mosquitoes.
 This outbreak prompted the Indian government to take measures such as setting up pig traps in severely affected areas, distributing thousands of mosquito nets and spraying pesticides.
 The government also promised several million doses of the vaccine against encephalitis, which will help to prepare health facilities for next year.
 Plans to deliver vaccines to the historically hardest-hit areas this year have been delayed due to a lack of funding and low priority compared to other diseases.
 In 1956, Slaney moved to Sweden, where three years later he began working for the Swedish Postal Company, and became their chief engraver.
 He created more than 1000 stamps for Sweden and 28 other countries.
 His work is so well known for its quality and detail that he is one of the few "household names" among philatelists, with some specializing in collecting only his work.
 His magnificent thousand-krona note of 2000 reproduces "The Great Deeds of the Swedish Kings" by David Klöcker Ehrenstrahl, it is entered in the Guinness Book of World Records.
 In addition, he was engaged in the engraving of banknotes for many countries. Recent examples of his work are the portraits of the Prime Minister on the front side of the new Canadian banknotes of 5 and 100 dollars.
 After the accident Gibson was taken to the hospital, but soon died.
 The 64-year-old truck driver was not injured in the accident.
 The car itself was removed from the scene of the accident on the same day at about 12:00 GMT.
 A man working in a garage near the scene of the accident said: "There were children standing there waiting to cross the road. They were all screaming and crying.
 Everyone ran away from the place where the accident occurred.
 Other issues on the Bali agenda include preserving the world's remaining forests and sharing technology to help developing countries grow in a less polluting way.
 The UN also hopes to complete the creation of a fund to help countries suffering from global warming to combat its effects.
 This money can be used to build flood-resistant houses, to use water resources rationally and to diversify agricultural crops.
 Fluck wrote that attempts to silence women about women's health have been unsuccessful.
 She came to this conclusion because of the numerous positive comments and support she received from both women and men, claiming that contraceptives should be considered as a medical necessity.
 When the fight ended, after the wounded were taken to the hospital, about 40 prisoners remained in the yard and refused to return to their cells.
 Negotiators tried to correct the situation, but the demands of the prisoners are not clear.
 Between 10:00 and 11:00 pm mountain time, the prisoners set fire to the yard.
 Soon guards in protective gear walked into the yard and pushed the prisoners into a corner, using tear gas.
 As a result, firefighters extinguished the fire at 23:35.
 After the construction of the dam in 1963, seasonal floods, which spread sediments along the river, ceased.
 This sediment was required to form beaches and sandbars, which were the habitat of wild animals.
 This has led to two species of fish becoming extinct, and two others, including the paddlefish, being threatened.
 Although the floodwaters will only rise a few feet, authorities hope that will be enough to restore the eroded sandbars downstream.
 There were no tsunami warnings and, according to the Jakarta Geophysical Agency, there will not be any, as the earthquake's magnitude did not reach 6.5.
 Despite the absence of a tsunami threat, residents began to panic and leave the premises of their companies and their homes.
 Although Winfrey was ready to cry during the farewell, she made it clear to her fans that she would return.
 "It's not a farewell. It's a closing of one chapter and opening of a new one."
 According to the final results of the presidential and parliamentary elections in Namibia, the incumbent President Hifikepunye Pohamba was re-elected with a large margin.
 The ruling South West African People's Organization (SWAPO) also retained its majority in the parliamentary elections.
 Coalition and Afghan forces moved into the area to secure the site, and another coalition aircraft was sent to provide support.
 The crash occurred in highlands, and is believed to have been the result of enemy fire.
 Attempts to search for the crash site are hampered by bad weather and difficult terrain.
 The medical charity Mango, Doctors Without Borders and the World Health Organization said it was the worst outbreak in the country's history.
 Doctors Without Borders spokesman Richard Vigne said: "Angola is heading for its worst outbreak ever and the situation in Angola remains very bad."
 The matches started at 10:00 in perfect weather, and if not for the drizzling morning rain, which quickly passed, it was an ideal day for rugby-7.
 Favorites of the tournament from South Africa started with the right note when they won a beautiful victory with a score of 26-00 over Zambia, which is in 5th position.
 Looking distinctly worse in their game against their southern sisters, South Africa gradually improved their performance as the tournament progressed.
 They were distinguished by disciplined defense, mastery of the ball and excellent teamwork, and it was clear that it was not easy to beat this team.
 Official representatives of the authorities of Amsterdam and the museum of Anne Frank say that the tree is infected with a fungus and poses a public danger, as there is an immediate threat of its falling.
 It was planned to cut it on Tuesday, but by the decree of the emergency court it was saved.
 The diameter of all the entrances to the cave, which were named "Seven Sisters", is at least 100-250 meters (328-820 feet).
 According to infrared images of the night and day temperatures, it is likely that these are caves.
 During the day they are colder than the surrounding surface, and at night they are warmer.
 Their thermal characteristics are not as stable as those of large caves on Earth, which often maintain a nearly constant temperature, but they are consistent with what is expected of deep pits in the ground, said Glen Cushing of the US Geological Survey and the University of Northern Arizona, located in Flagstaff, Arizona.
 In France, voting is traditionally carried out in a low-tech way: the voter closes himself in a booth and puts a pre-printed ballot paper, indicating the candidate of his choice, into an envelope.
 After officials verify the voter's identity, he or she drops the envelope into the ballot box and signs the voter list.
 French laws on elections are quite strictly systematized procedures.
 Since 1988, ballot boxes must be transparent so that voters and observers can see that there are no envelopes inside at the beginning of the voting and that no other envelopes have been added, except those of those who have been allowed to vote and whose votes have been counted properly.
 Candidates can send their representatives to follow the process. In the evening, the votes are counted by volunteers under strict supervision according to a special procedure.
 The ASUS Eee PC series, previously introduced worldwide with a focus on factors such as cost-effectiveness and functionality, became a hot topic during the month of information technology in Taipei in 2007.
 But the consumer market for notebooks will change dramatically after the company ASUS was awarded the Taiwan Excellence Award for stability by the Executive Yuan of the Republic of China in 2007.
 The station's website describes the show as "traditional radio theater with a new and outrageously twisted vision!"
 In the initial period of its existence, the show was broadcast only on the site of the long-established online radio TogiNet Radio, dedicated to radio conversations.
 In late 2015, TogiNet created AstroNet Radio as a subsidiary radio station.
 The show was originally voiced by amateur actors from East Texas.
 The looting reportedly continued throughout the night as there were no law enforcement officers on the streets of Bishkek.
 Bishkek was described by one observer as descending into anarchy as groups of people ran through the streets and looted consumer goods stores.
 Some Bishkek residents accused the southern protesters of lawlessness.
 South Africa defeated the All Blacks (New Zealand) in the Tri Nations Cup rugby union match at the Royal Bafokeng Stadium in Rustenburg, South Africa.
 The final score was a one-point win, 21–20, ending the All Blacks' winning streak at 15 games.
 For "Springbox" this interrupted a five-match losing streak.
 This match was the last for the "All Blacks", who had already won the cup two weeks ago.
 The final match of the season will be held at Ellis Park in Johannesburg next week, when the Springboks will play against Australia.
 A moderate earthquake occurred Monday in the western part of the state of Montana at 22:08.
 The U.S. Geological Survey (USGS) and its National Earthquake Information Center have received no reports of damage.
 The earthquake's epicenter was about 20 km (15 miles) northeast of Dillon and about 65 km (40 miles) south of Butte.
 It was confirmed that the strain of bird flu H5N1, deadly to humans, was infected dead wild duck found Monday on a marsh near Leon in eastern France.
 France is the seventh EU country to be affected by the virus, after Austria, Germany, Slovenia, Bulgaria, Greece and Italy.
 Cases with suspected H5N1 in Croatia and Denmark remain unconfirmed.
 Chambers sued God for "spreading death, destruction and terror to millions and millions of Earth's inhabitants."
 Agnostic Chambers claims that his lawsuit is "not serious" and "anyone can sue anyone."
 The story, told in the French opera by Camille Saint-Saëns, is about an artist "whose life is governed by his love of drugs and Japan".
 As a result, the actors smoke joints on stage, and the theater itself encourages the audience to join in.
 Former House Speaker Newt Gingrich, Texas Governor Rick Perry and Congresswoman Michele Bachmann took fourth, fifth and sixth place respectively.
 After the results were known, Gingrich praised Santorum, but harshly criticized Romney, on whose behalf negative information against Gingrich was broadcast in Iowa.
 Perry said he would return to Texas "to assess the results of today's party meeting and determine whether I should continue the race," but later said he would continue and would participate in the South Carolina primary on January 21.
 Bachmann, who won a straw poll in August in the city of Ames, has decided to end her campaign.
 The photographer was taken to the Ronald Reagan UCLA Medical Center, where he later died.
 He was reported to be between 20 and 30 years old. In a statement, Bieber said: "Although I was not present at the tragic incident and was not directly involved, my thoughts and prayers are with the victim's family."
 The entertainment and news website TMZ believes that the photographer stopped his car on the opposite side of the boulevard Sepulveda and tried to take pictures of the police stopping traffic before crossing the road and continuing. A California Highway Patrol officer who stopped traffic was twice forced to order him to cross back.
 According to police, the driver of the car that hit the photographer will most likely not be charged with a crime.
 Given that only eighteen medals could be won in a day, a number of countries failed to make the podium.
 They include the Netherlands with Anna Jochemsen, who finished ninth in the women's race standing in the super-G, and Finland with Katja Saari, who finished tenth in the same race.
 Australia's Mitchell Gourley finished eleventh in the men's standing super-G. Czech Ondrej Elinek finished sixteenth in the men's sitting super-G.
 Arli Velasquez of Mexico finished 15th among men in the super-G in the sitting position. New Zealander Adam Hall finished ninth among men in the super-G in the standing position.
 Polish visually impaired skier Maciej Krezel and guide athlete Anna Ogarzynska finished thirteenth in the super-G. South Korean skier Pak Chon-Sok finished twenty-fourth in the super-G among men in a sitting position.
 UN peacekeepers who arrived in Haiti after the 2010 earthquake are accused of spreading a disease that began near their military camp.
 According to the lawsuit, waste from the UN camp was not properly sanitized, resulting in bacteria entering the Artibonite River, one of Haiti's largest.
 Before the arrival of troops, the state of Haiti did not face problems related to this disease since the beginning of the 19th century.
 The Haitian Institute for Justice and Democracy cited an independent study that suggests the UN peacekeeping battalion from Nepal inadvertently brought the disease to Haiti.
 Daniel Lantagne, a UN expert on the disease, said the outbreak was likely caused by peacekeepers.
 Hamilton confirmed that the patient was admitted to Howard University Hospital in stable condition.
 The patient visited Nigeria, where a number of cases of infection with the Ebola virus were detected.
 The hospital followed infection control protocols, including keeping the patient in isolation to prevent possible infection of other patients.
 Before "The Simpsons", Simon worked in various positions on several shows.
 In the 1980s, he worked on shows such as Taxi, Cheers, and The Tracey Ullman Show.
 In 1989, along with Brooks and Groening, he helped create "The Simpsons" and was responsible for the first team of writers of this series.
 Despite leaving the show in 1993, he remained executive producer and still received tens of millions of dollars in fees each season.
 Earlier, the Chinese news agency Xinhua reported that the plane was hijacked.
 It was later reported that the plane received a bomb threat and was diverted back to Afghanistan, landing in Kandahar.
 Early reports said the plane returned to Afghanistan after being denied an emergency landing in Urumqi.
 Air crashes are common in Iran, where an aging fleet is poorly maintained for both civilian and military operations.
 International sanctions have made it impossible to buy new aircraft.
 Earlier this week, three people were killed and three others were injured in a crash of a police plane.
 Last year, Iran suffered its worst air disaster in years when a plane bound for Armenia crashed, killing 168 people on board.
 In the same month, another airliner rolled off the runway in Mashhad and crashed into a wall, killing seventeen people.
 Aerosmith has canceled the remaining concerts of its tour.
 The band was scheduled to tour the U.S. and Canada until September 16.
 They cancelled the tour after singer Steve Tyler was injured in a fall from the stage during a concert on August 5.
 Murray lost the first set in a tie-break after both men had saved absolutely every shot in the set.
 Del Potro had an early advantage in the second set, but it also required a tie-break after reaching 6-6.
 At the moment, Potro has been given medical treatment for his shoulder and he has managed to return to play.
 The program began at 8:30 pm local time (or 15:00 UTC).
 Renowned singers from all over the country performed bhajans or songs of devotion at the feet of Sri Shiam.
 The evening began with singer Sandhu Sharma, followed by Jay Shankar Chaudhary. He presented the chhappan bhog bhajan as well. He was accompanied by singer Raju Khandelwal.
 Then Lakha Singh took over the leadership in singing bhajans.
 Babaji was served 108 plates of chapan-bhog (in Hinduism, 56 different dishes, including sweets, fruits, nuts and other dishes, presented to the deity).
 Lakhha Singh performed the Chhappan Bhog Bhajan. Singer Raju Khandelwal sang along with him.
 Nintendo President Satoru Iwata unveiled the design of the new Nintendo Revolution game console at the main presentation of the "Tokyo Game Show" on Thursday.
 The controller, which looks like a TV remote, uses two sensors next to the user's TV to calculate their position in three-dimensional space.
 By moving the device in the air, players will be able to control actions and movements in video games.
 Giancarlo Fisichella lost control of his car and finished the race shortly after the start.
 His teammate Fernando Alonso was the leader most of the race, but finished it immediately after the pit stop, probably because of the poorly tightened right front wheel.
 Michael Schumacher finished the race shortly after Alonso due to a suspension failure sustained during numerous overtaking attempts during the race.
 "She is very nice and sings very well," he said, referring to the transcript of the press conference.
 "I was completely sincere touched every time we rehearsed it."
 About 3 minutes after launch, the onboard camera showed numerous pieces of insulation foam falling away from the fuel tank.
 However, it is assumed that they did not cause any damage to the shuttle.
 NASA shuttle program manager N. Wayne Hale said the foam came off "after a period of time that causes us concern."
 Five minutes before the start of the fireworks, the wind began to increase, a minute later the wind reached 70 kilometers per hour... Then it started to rain, so strong and large, as if needles were falling on you, then hail fell from the sky, people in a panic shouted and collided with each other.
 I lost my sister and her friend, and on my way there were two disabled people in wheelchairs, people just jumped over them and pushed them," Armand Versace said.
 NHK also reported that the Kashiwazaki Kariwa nuclear power plant, located in Niigata Prefecture, was operating in a standard mode.
 Hokuriku Electric Power Co. reported no damage from the quake, and said its No. 1 and No. 2 reactors at its Shika nuclear power plant were shut down.
 About 9,400 homes in the region were reported to be without water and about 100 without electricity.
 Some roads are damaged, and the railway and airport in Ishikawa Prefecture are still closed.
 One of the bombs exploded near the office of the governor-general.
 Three more bombs exploded near government buildings within two hours.
 According to some reports, the official death toll is eight people, and official reports confirm that up to 30 people were injured; but the final figures are still unknown.
 In the urine samples of animals that died after eating contaminated pet food, both cyanuric acid and melamine were found.
 The university researchers reported that the two compounds react with each other to form crystals that can block the kidneys.
 During the observations, the researchers found crystalline formations that arise in cat urine when cyanuric acid and melamine are added.
 When comparing using infrared Fourier spectroscopy, it was found that the composition of these crystals corresponds to crystals found in the urine of affected domestic animals.
 I don't know if you realize it or not, but most of the goods from Central America were brought into this country duty free.
 Nevertheless, eighty percent of our goods were taxed according to tariffs in Central American countries.
 It didn't seem to make sense to me; of course it wasn't fair.
 I tell people that they will be treated the way they treat others.
 California Governor Arnold Schwarzenegger signed a law banning the sale or rental of violent video games to minors.
 The law requires that violent computer games be sold in California with a sticker that says "18" and that the sale of games to minors be punished with a $1,000 fine for each violation.
 This morning the Attorney General, Kier Starmer, QC, announced that criminal proceedings have been commenced against both Hoon and Blair.
 Hoon has resigned and will be replaced in the Cabinet by MP Ed Davey. It is expected that MP Norman Lamb will take over Davey's post as Business Secretary.
 Hoon and Price are due to appear at Westminster Magistrates' Court on February 16.
 The dead were Nicholas Alden, 25, and Zachary Cadebeck, 21. Cadebeck was the driver.
 Edgar Vigilla received injuries to his hand and jaw, while Christopher Schneider needed reconstructive surgery on his face.
 The Uzi gun jammed when it was aimed at the fifth man. Schneider feels constant pain, he is blind in one eye, he has a part of his skull missing, and his face is reconstructed with titanium.
 Schneider gave testimony via video link from the US Air Force base in his home country.
 In addition to Wednesday's competition, Carpendale took part in two individual competitions at the championships.
 Her first competition was a slalom, in which she did not finish the first run, and 36 of the 116 competitors had the same result in that race.
 In another race, this time in the giant slalom, she finished tenth among women in the sitting position with a combined time of 4:41.30, 2:11.60 minutes slower than the first-placed Austrian Claudia Lechner and 1:09.02 minutes slower than the ninth-placed Hungarian Dénes Dáni.
 Four skiers in the women's sitting group failed to finish their runs, and 45 of 117 skiers in the giant slalom failed to finish.
 The Madhya Pradesh police have returned the stolen laptop and mobile phone.
 Deputy Inspector General D.K. Arya said, "We have arrested five people who raped the Swiss woman and returned her mobile phone and laptop."
 The accused have names Babu Kandjar, Bhuta Kandjar, Rampo Kandjar and Vishnu Kandjar.
 Police chief Chandra Shekhar Solanki said the accused were presented before the judges with their faces covered.
 Although there were three people inside the building at the time the car crashed into it, no one was injured.
 However, the driver suffered serious head injuries.
 The road where the accident occurred was temporarily closed while emergency services freed the driver from the red Audi TT.
 He was initially taken to James Paget Hospital in Great Yarmouth.
 He was subsequently transferred to Addenbrooke's Hospital in Cambridge.
 The Edinburgh Sheriff Court subsequently charged Adekoye with the murder of her son.
 She is in custody awaiting charges and trial, but any testimony she gives could be tainted because her popularity has been widely exploited by the media.
 This is common practice in other parts of the UK, but Scottish law works differently, and the courts found the publication of the photographs potentially damaging.
 Professor Pamela Ferguson of the University of Dundee notes that "journalists do seem to be treading a dangerous line by publishing photographs and other details of suspects".
 The Royal Prosecutor's Office, which is generally responsible for prosecution, told reporters that no further comment would be made, at least until a verdict is issued.
 The document, according to the leaked information, will concern the dispute over the borders that Palestine wants to establish on the basis of those that existed before the Six-Day War of 1967.
 Other topics reportedly include the future status of Jerusalem, which is holy to both peoples, and the Jordan River Valley.
 Israel demands a permanent military presence in the valley for ten years after the signing of the agreement, while the PNA agrees to keep such a presence for only five years.
 The traps involved in the additional pest control test had to be under the close supervision of rangers, as the test was monitored and its effectiveness evaluated.
 As part of the partnership between NPWS and the NSW Sporting Shooters Association, a hunting program was run by the NSW Sporting Shooters Association to recruit qualified volunteers.
 According to Mick O'Flinn, acting director of wildlife conservation and national parks, four shooters selected for the first shooting operation underwent comprehensive training and safety instructions.
 Yesterday, Martelly swore in a new Provisional Electoral Council (CEP) consisting of nine members.
 This is the fifth CEP Martinez in four years.
 Last month, the presidential commission recommended the previous interim electoral council resign as part of a package of measures to move the country toward new elections.
 The commission was Marcelli's response to the mass protests against the state regime that began in October.
 These sometimes violent protests were caused by the failure to hold elections, some of which were supposed to have taken place as early as 2011.
 About 60 cases of overheating of defective iPod devices have been reported, resulting in six fires and four minor burns.
 Japan's Ministry of Economy, Trade and Industry (METI) said it was aware of 27 cases involving the devices.
 Last week, the Ministry of Economy, Labor and Industry announced that Apple had informed it of 34 additional cases of overheating, which the company called "non-serious".
 In response, the ministry called Apple's delay in reporting the issue "very regrettable."
 At 07:19 local time (21:19 GMT on Friday) there was an earthquake in Mariana.
 The Northern Mariana Islands Emergency Management Office said there were no reports of damage in the country.
 The Pacific Tsunami Warning Center also said there were no signs of a tsunami.
 A former Philippine police officer hijacked a tour bus in Manila, the capital of the Philippines, and took Hong Kong tourists hostage.
 Rolando Mendoza fired his M16 rifle at the tourists.
 Several hostages have been rescued, and at least six have been confirmed dead so far.
 Six hostages, including children and elderly people, were freed earlier, as well as Filipino photographers.
 Later, photographers took the place of the elderly woman, as she went to the toilet. Mendoza was shot.
 Lygins followed in his father's footsteps and began a career in medicine.
 He trained as a midwife and began working at the National Women's Hospital in Auckland in 1959.
 While working at the hospital, in his free time, Liggins began to investigate cases of premature birth.
 His research showed that if you introduce the hormone, it will enhance the maturation of the lungs of the child during the development of the fetus.
 According to Xinhua, on Wednesday, state investigators found two flight recorders, or "black boxes."
 Fellow wrestlers also paid tribute to the moon.
 Tommy Driemr said: "The Moon was the first Queen of Extreme. She was my first manager. The Moon passed away on the night of two moons. It is already a unique event, like she herself. A strong woman."
 Dustin "Goldust" Runnels said, "The moon was as infected as I was... Perhaps even more infected... I love her and will miss her... I hope she's in a better place."
 Of 1,400 people surveyed in the run-up to the 2010 federal election, the number of those opposed to Australia becoming a republic increased by 8 per cent since 2008.
 Acting Prime Minister Julia Gillard during the 2010 federal election campaign expressed the view that Australia should become a republic after the reign of Queen Elizabeth II.
 34% of those surveyed share this view and want Queen Elizabeth II to be the last monarch of Australia.
 The survey showed the following: 29 percent of respondents believe that Australia should become a republic as soon as possible, and 31 percent believe that it does not need this form of government.
 The Olympic gold medallist was due to compete in the 100m and 200m freestyle and three relay events at the Commonwealth Games but his fitness is now in doubt after he complained of illness.
 He was unable to take painkillers, which are banned in the Games.
 Curtis Cooper, a mathematician and professor of computer science at the University of Central Missouri, on January 25 discovered the largest prime number known to date.
 On Tuesday, it was announced that by early February, several people had confirmed this discovery using various hardware and software.
 Comets may have been the source of water delivery to Earth, as well as the source of organic materials that can form proteins and support life.
 Scientists hope to understand how planets form, especially how Earth formed, as comets have been colliding with Earth for a very long time.
 Cuomo, 53, began his tenure as governor earlier this year and signed a bill legalizing same-sex marriage last month.
 He called the rumors "political nonsense and stupidity."
 He is expected to run for president in 2016.
 NextGen is a system that, according to the U.S. Federal Aviation Administration, will allow planes to fly more direct routes and save millions of gallons of fuel and reduce carbon emissions each year.
 It uses satellite technology instead of the old ground-based radar technology, which will allow air traffic controllers to more accurately determine the position of aircraft and give pilots more accurate information.
 No additional transport has been brought to Wembley, there will not be any ground trains stopping there, and there are no parking lots and pick-up points on the surface.
 Concerns about transportation have prompted speculation that the game might have to be played behind closed doors without fans.
 The study, published Thursday in the journal Science, describes the emergence of a new species of bird on the Galapagos Islands of Ecuador.
 Researchers from Princeton University (USA) and Uppsala University (Sweden) reported that due to the mating of the endemic Darwin's finch (Geospiza fortes) with the transplanted cactus finch (Geospiza conirostris), a new species evolved in just two generations, although it was believed that this process would take much longer.
 Gold can be given any shape. It can be cast into very small forms.
 It can be drawn into a thin wire, which can be twisted and plaited. It can be hammered or rolled into rods.
 It can be made very thin and attached to another metal. It can be made so thin that it was sometimes used to decorate hand-painted illustrations in books – the so-called "facing page".
 This is called the pH of a chemical. You can make an indicator using red cabbage juice.
 Cabbage juice changes color depending on how acidic or alkaline the chemical is.
 The pH value is determined by the degree of saturation of hydrogen ions (H in pH) of the investigated chemical compound.
 Hydrogen ions are protons from which electrons have been removed (hydrogen atoms consist of one proton and one electron).
 Get a new mixture by mixing two dry powders in one container, and then with clean wet hands, form a ball from this mixture.
 The moisture on your hands will react with the top layer, which will be unusual, then a kind of shell will form.
 Almost every house in the cities of Harappa and Mohenjo-Daro had a toilet with a flush, connected to a complex sewage system.
 Remaining fragments of the sewage systems were discovered in the houses of Minoan cities on the islands of Crete and Santorini in Greece.
 Toilets were also in ancient Egypt, Persia and China. In Roman civilization, toilets were sometimes part of public baths, where men and women bathed together.
 When you call someone thousands of miles away, you use a satellite.
 The satellite in space receives the call and almost instantly reflects it back down.
 The satellite was delivered into space by a rocket. Scientists use telescopes in space because the Earth's atmosphere somewhat distorts our light and view.
 To launch a satellite or telescope into space requires a giant rocket more than 100 feet tall.
 The wheel has changed our world in incredible ways. Most importantly, the wheel has given us much easier and faster transportation.
 It gave us the train, the automobile, and many other vehicles.
 Under them are more medium-sized cats that eat prey ranging from rabbits to antelopes and deer.
 And finally, many small cats (including stray house cats) eat and hunt much smaller animals, such as insects, rodents, lizards, and birds.
 The secret to their success is the niche concept, the special work that each type of cat does, which keeps it from competing with others.
 Lions are the most social cats, living in large groups called prides.
 The pride consists of one to three adult males related to each other, as well as females and cubs, the number of which can reach thirty.
 Females are usually related to each other and form a large family of sisters and daughters.
 Lion prides behave very much like wolf packs or dog packs — animals that are remarkably similar to lions (but not other big cats) in their behavior and also very dangerous to their prey.
 Being a well-rounded athlete, the tiger can climb trees (though not very well), swim, jump long distances, and pull with the strength of five strong men.
 The tiger belongs to the same genus (Panthera) as lions, leopards and jaguars, and these four cats are the only ones that have the ability to roar.
 A tiger's roar is not like a full-throated roar of a lion, but more like the utterance of sentences from unintelligible words.
 Ocelots love to eat small animals. If the opportunity arises, they will catch monkeys, snakes, rodents and birds. Almost all the animals that the ocelot hunts are much smaller than him.
 Scientists believe that ocelots follow the trail of animals and find prey by smell, tracking its movements on the ground with their sense of smell.
 They are able to see perfectly in the dark with the help of night vision and almost imperceptibly move. Ocelots hunt prey, merging with the surrounding environment, and then attack prey.
 When a small group of living organisms (a small population) becomes separated from the main population from which they originated (for example, if they cross a mountain range or a river, or if they move to a new island from which they cannot easily return), they often find themselves in an environment that is different from the one they were in before.
 This new environment has different resources and different competitors, so the new population will need different characteristics or changes from what it had before to become a strong competitor.
 The original population has not changed at all - it still needs the same adaptations as before.
 Over time, as a new population begins to adapt to a new environment, it begins to look less and less like the rest of the population.
 Over time, through thousands or even millions of years, these two populations will look so different that it will be impossible to tell that they are the same species.
 We call this process speciation, the origin of new species. Speciation is a necessary consequence of, and an essential part of, evolution.
 Plants produce the oxygen that humans breathe and absorb the carbon dioxide that humans exhale.
 Plants feed from the sun by means of photosynthesis. In addition, they cast a shadow.
 We build our houses and make our clothes from plants. Most of our food comes from plants. Without plants, animals could not survive.
 The Mosasaurus was the most fearsome predator of its time, so it was not afraid of anyone except other mosasaurs.
 His long jaws were lined with more than 70 sharp teeth, in addition to an extra row on his palate, so that those who met him on his path had no chance of escape.
 We don’t know for sure, but it’s possible that his tongue was forked. He ate turtles, large fish, other mosasaurs, and may have been a cannibal.
 It also attacked anything that came into the water; even a giant dinosaur like a tyrannosaur would not have been able to compete with it.
 Although most of their food would be familiar to us, the Romans did have some strange and unusual dishes served at feasts, such as boar, peacock, snails and a type of rodent called a porcupine.
 There was another difference: while the poor people and women ate sitting on chairs, the rich liked to have joint feasts, during which they ate lying on their sides.
 The diet of the ancient Romans could not include foods that came to Europe from America or Asia in subsequent centuries.
 In particular, they had no corn, tomatoes, potatoes, cocoa, and no ancient Roman did not try turkey.
 The Babylonians built each of the gods a main sanctuary, which was considered the home of the god.
 People made sacrifices to the gods, and priests tried to please the gods' wishes in ceremonies and festivals.
 Each temple had an open courtyard and an inner sanctum, which only priests could enter.
 Sometimes as elements of the temple were built special towers in the form of pyramids called "zikkurats".
 The top of the tower was a special sanctuary for the god.
 In the warm climate of the Middle East, the house was not particularly important.
 Much of the Jewish family's life was spent outdoors.
 Women prepared in the yard; shops were open counters, which opened onto the street. For the construction of houses used stone.
 There were no large forests in the land of Canaan, so wood was extremely expensive.
 Greenland was sparsely populated. The Scandinavian sagas tell of Erik the Red being banished from Iceland for murder and, moving further west, discovering Greenland and giving it its name.
 But regardless of his discovery, there were already Eskimo tribes living there at the time.
 Although each of the countries was Scandinavian, there were many differences between the peoples, rulers, traditions, and history of Denmark, Sweden, Norway, and Iceland.
 If you saw the movie National Treasure, you might think that the Declaration of Independence was printed on the back with a map of treasures.
 However, this is not true. Although something is written on the back of the document, it is not a treasure map.
 On the back of the Declaration of Independence it says: "The Declaration of Independence was signed on July 4, 1776." The text is written at the bottom of the document and upside down.
 Although no one knows for sure who wrote it, it is known that at the beginning of its existence this large parchment document (29¾ by 24½ inches) was rolled up for more convenient storage.
 So it is quite possible that the entry was added simply as a note.
 As a result of Operation Neptune and subsequent battles, the north of France was liberated, but the south was still not liberated.
 It was under the control of the "Vichy" French, who made peace with the Germans in 1940 and worked with the invaders instead of opposing them.
 On August 15, 1940, the Allies invaded southern France. The invasion was called "Operation Dragoon".
 In just 2 weeks, the Free French and the Americans liberated southern France and headed towards Germany.
 Civilization is a separate culture, the bearers of which is a fairly large group of people living and working together, society.
 The word "civilization" comes from the Latin civilis, which means "civil" and is a relative of the Latin words civis, meaning "citizen", and civitas, meaning "city" or "city-state", and it also expresses the size of society in some way.
 City-states are the precursors of nations. Civilizational culture implies the transmission of knowledge through several generations, a continuous cultural presence and a transmissible spread.
 Small cultures often disappear without leaving any historical evidence, and therefore cannot be recognized as genuine civilizations.
 During the American Revolutionary War, thirteen states, under the Articles of Confederation, formed a weak central government, with a single body, the Congress.
 Congress had no taxing powers, and since there was no national executive or judicial authority, it relied on the states, which often refused to cooperate and refused to enforce its acts.
 He also had no authority to repeal state tax laws and tariffs.
 To pass amendments, according to the articles, requires the unanimous approval of all states, but the states have been so irresponsible to the central government that their representatives are often absent.
 The Italian national football team, along with the German, is the second most successful team in the world and won the FIFA World Cup in 2006.
 Popular sports include football, basketball, volleyball, water polo, fencing, rugby, cycling, ice hockey, roller hockey and Formula One auto racing.
 Winter sports are most popular in the northern regions. The inhabitants of these regions participate in international competitions and the Olympics.
 Japan has approximately 7,000 islands (the largest of which is Honshu), making it the 7th largest island in the world!
 Due to its belonging to the cluster / group of islands, Japan is often called from a geographical point of view an archipelago.
 Taiwan has its origins many years ago, in the 15th century, when European sailors passing by recorded the name of the island as Ilha Formosa, or "beautiful island".
 In 1624, the Dutch East India Company established a base on the southwest of Taiwan, initiating the transformation of indigenous methods of rice production and hiring Chinese workers to work on their rice and sugar plantations.
 In 1683, the Qing dynasty (1644-1912) took control of western and northern coastal areas of Taiwan and in 1885 declared Taiwan a province of the Qing Empire.
 In 1895, after the defeat in the Sino-Japanese War (1894-1895), the Qing government signed the Treaty of Shimonoseki, which ceded the rights to Taiwan to Japan, which ruled the island until 1945.
 Machu Picchu consists of three main structures, namely Intihuatana, the Temple of the Sun and the Room of Three Windows.
 Most of the buildings on the edges of the complex have been rebuilt to give tourists a more accurate idea of how they looked originally.
 By 1976, 30% of Machu Picchu had been restored. Restoration work continues to this day.
 For example, the most common format for static photographs in the world is 35 mm, and it was this size that was the dominant size of film at the twilight of the analog era.
 It is still produced today, but more importantly, its aspect ratio has been inherited by the dimensions of digital camera images.
 The 35mm format is actually somewhat confusing, it has a width of 36mm and a height of 24mm.
 The aspect ratio of this format (divided by twelve to get a ratio with small whole numbers) is therefore taken to be 3:2.
 Many common formats (e.g. the APS family) are equal to or close to these proportions.
 Too often used and often ridiculed rule of thirds is a simple recommendation that creates dynamism while maintaining a certain degree of order in the image.
 It says that it is best to place the main object at the intersection of the lines dividing the image into three parts vertically and horizontally (see example).
 During this period of European history, the Catholic Church, having become rich and powerful, came under scrutiny.
 For more than a thousand years, Christianity united European states despite differences in languages and traditions.
 Her all-pervading power touched everyone - from the king to the commoner.
 One of the main Christian principles is that wealth should be used to alleviate suffering and poverty, and that the church's money exists for this purpose.
 The center of church authority was based in Rome for more than a thousand years, and this concentration of power and wealth led many to question whether this dogma was being observed.
 Shortly after the beginning of hostilities, Britain imposed a naval blockade on Germany.
 This strategy proved effective in cutting off vital military and civilian supplies, although the blockade violated universally accepted international laws set forth in several international agreements over the past two hundred years.
 Britain has mined international waters to prevent ships from entering entire sectors of the oceans, putting even neutral vessels at risk.
 As the reaction to this tactic was restrained, Germany expected a similar reaction to its unrestricted submarine warfare.
 Among most citizens and nations in the 1920s, sentiments such as pacifism and isolationism prevailed.
 Having experienced the horrors and atrocities of the First World War, states wanted to avoid a similar situation in the future.
 In 1884, Tesla moved to the United States and accepted an offer to work for Edison in New York City.
 He arrived in the United States with four cents in his pocket, a book of poetry, and a letter of recommendation from Charles Batchelor, who had been his boss at his previous job, to Thomas Edison.
 In ancient China, a unique way of indicating periods of time was used; each period of China or each family that was in power was a particular dynasty.
 In addition, between the reigns of each dynasty there was fragmentation and instability. The most famous was the Three Kingdoms era, which lasted 60 years during the Han and Jin dynasties.
 During this period there were fierce military actions between many noble people fighting for the throne.
 The Three Kingdoms era was one of the bloodiest periods in ancient China, with thousands of people dying in the struggle for the throne in the great palace in Xi'an.
 There are many such social and political effects, such as the use of the metric system, the transition from absolutism to republicanism, nationalism, and the belief that the country belongs to the people, not to a single ruler.
 Also after the Revolution, opportunities for work opened up to all men, which allowed the most ambitious and talented to succeed.
 The same is true of the army, because ranks were based on qualities, not on origin.
 The French Revolution also inspired many other oppressed working class people in other countries to start their own revolutions.
 Muhammad was very interested in topics not related to worldly life. He often visited a cave that became known as "Hira" on the mountain "Nur" (light) for reflection.
 And the cave, which has survived to our days, gives us a very vivid idea of the spiritual aspirations of Muhammad.
 The cave is located on the top of a mountain north of Mecca and is completely isolated from the rest of the world.
 It is very difficult to find even for those who know about its existence. In the cave, a person is in complete isolation.
 There is nothing to see but the pure blue sky above your head and the many surrounding mountains. From the depths of the cave you can see and hear only a very small part of this world.
 The Great Pyramid of Giza is the only one of the Seven Wonders of the World that still exists today.
 The Great Pyramid was built by the Egyptians in the third century BC and is one of many large pyramid-shaped structures built to honor the pharaoh.
 The Giza Plateau, or the Giza Necropolis, in the Egyptian Valley of the Kings, includes several pyramids (of which the Great Pyramid of Giza is the largest), several smaller tombs, several temples, and the Great Sphinx.
 The Great Pyramid was built in honor of Pharaoh Khufu, and many smaller pyramids, tombs and temples were built in honor of Khufu's wives and relatives.
 The sign for the movement of the hook up looks like a V, and the movement of the hook down — as a hook or a square without a bottom.
 "Up" means you should start at the tip and pull the bow forward, and "down" means you should start at the place where your hand holds the bow and pull it back.
 The upward movement of the bow usually produces a softer sound, while the downward movement of the bow produces a stronger and more forceful sound.
 You can draw your own staves, but remember that the staves are printed for musical reasons, and it is usually best to follow them.
 On October 6, 1789, an angry mob of women from the market forced King Louis XVI, Queen Marie-Antoinette, their two young children (11-year-old Marie-Thérèse and 4-year-old Louis-Charles) and the king's sister, Madame Élisabeth, to return to Paris from Versailles.
 They returned to Paris in a carriage, surrounded by a crowd of people who shouted threats to the king and queen.
 The crowd of people forced the King and Queen to open the windows wide.
 At one point, one of the crowd waved to a royal guardsman killed at Versailles in front of the terrified queen.
 The military expenditures of American imperialism for the conquest of the Philippines were paid by the Filipinos themselves.
 They were forced to pay taxes to the American colonial regime to pay for most of the expenses and interest on bonds moved on behalf of the Philippine government through Wall Street banking houses.
 Of course, the superprofits derived from the long exploitation of the Filipinos constituted the main source of income of American imperialism.
 To understand the Templars, one must understand the context that led to their creation.
 The era in which these events took place is called the High Middle Ages, a period of European history covering the 11th, 12th and 13th centuries (1000–1300 CE).
 The High Middle Ages succeeded the earlier Middle Ages and preceded the Late Middle Ages, which, according to the accepted view, ended around 1500.
 Technological determinism is a term encompassing a wide range of practical ideas, from technological progress or technological imperative to a strict point of view that the fate of people is driven by the fundamental logic associated with the laws of science and their manifestation in technology.
 Most views of technological determinism share two general ideas: that the direction of technological development is virtually impervious to cultural or political influence, and that, in turn, the "effects" of technology on society are determined by its own properties, not by society.
 For example, one could say that the automobile is a necessary cause of the development of roads.
 However, the national road network is economically unprofitable for only a small group of cars, so new methods of production are being developed, which allow to reduce the cost of owning a car.
 Mass ownership of cars also leads to an increase in the number of accidents on the roads, which leads to the invention in health care of new methods of treatment of injuries.
 Romanticism in many ways included cultural determinism, drawn from writers such as Goethe, Fichte and Schlegel.
 In the context of romanticism, geography shaped people, and over time, related customs and culture arose, which, being in harmony with the place of residence of this society, were better than arbitrarily imposed laws.
 Just as Paris is called the capital of fashion in the modern world, so Constantinople was considered the capital of fashion in the feudal Europe.
 Fame as a center of luxury began about 400 AD and lasted until about 1100 AD.
 Its status declined during the twelfth century mainly because the Crusaders returned with such luxuries as silk and spices, which were more highly valued than the goods offered in the Byzantine markets.
 At this point, the title of Fashion Capital was transferred from Constantinople to Paris.
 The Gothic style reached its peak between the 10th and 11th centuries and the 14th century.
 At first, the clothing was strongly influenced by Byzantine culture in the east.
 However, due to slow communication channels, styles in the west may lag 25-30 years behind.
 Own styles began to develop in Western Europe by the end of the Middle Ages. One of the greatest achievements of that time, thanks to the Crusades, was the use of buttons for fastening clothes.
 Subsistence agriculture is agriculture that is practiced for the production of enough food to feed the farmer and his/her family.
 Natural farming is a simple, often organic, system of agriculture using seeds from plants that grow in the given ecosystem, along with the use of crop rotation and other relatively simple methods of increasing crop yields.
 Historically, most farmers have been engaged in agriculture for subsistence, and this is still the case in many developing countries.
 Subcultures unite like-minded people who feel oppressed by society's standards, and allow such people to define themselves.
 Between subcultures there may be differences due to age, nationality, social status, place of residence and/or gender of the people who make it up.
 The characteristics that define a subculture as distinctive may be linguistic, aesthetic, religious, political, sexual, geographic, or a combination of factors.
 Members of a subculture often declare their membership through a distinctive and symbolic use of style, including fashion, mannerisms, and slang.
 One of the most common methods used to illustrate the importance of socialization is to illustrate several unfortunate cases where children, due to lack of attention, unfortunate circumstances, or deliberate abuse, did not have contact with adults during their maturation.
 Such children are called "feral" or "wild". Some feral children were isolated by humans (usually their own parents). In some cases, such rejection of their child was the result of the parents' rejection of their child's serious intellectual or physical disability.
 Children living on the streets may have experienced severe forms of violence or injury before running away or being abandoned.
 Others, it is claimed, were raised by animals; some of them lived in the wild on their own.
 If he is fully raised by animals instead of humans, a feral child displays behaviors (within physical limits) in almost everything similar to the particular animal that raised him — for example, his fear or indifference to humans.
 While project-based learning should be more straightforward and interesting, scaffolding is ahead of many technologies.
 Scaffolding is not a teaching method, but rather a form of assistance to those going through a new learning experience, such as using a new computer program or starting a new project.
 Scaffolding can be both virtual and real. In other words, a teacher is a form of scaffolding, but so is Scribbles in Microsoft Office.
 Virtual scaffolding, which helps in learning, is built into the software and is designed to remind, explain and ask questions about procedures that the trainee might find too difficult to handle alone.
 Children are placed under guardianship for a variety of reasons, from homelessness to abuse and even extortion.
 Children should not grow up in an environment where education, care and education are not provided, but grow up.
 We consider the foster care system safe for children.
 Our foster care system should provide safe housing, loving foster parents, stable education, and reliable health care.
 Foster care should provide all the needs that were lacking in the home from which they were removed.
 The Internet combines elements of both mass and interpersonal communication.
 The distinctive features of the Internet lead to additional dimensions in terms of approach and satisfaction.
 Thus, the idea that "learning" and "socialization" are important motivating factors for using the Internet (James et al., 1995)
 "Personal involvement" and "long-term contact" were also named by Eimme and McCorrd (1998) as new dimensions of motivation when they studied how people respond to websites.
 The use of video recordings has led to important discoveries in the field of interpretation of microexpressions - facial movements lasting a few milliseconds.
 In particular, it is claimed that it is possible to determine whether a person is lying by means of the correct interpretation of his microexpressions.
 In the article "The President's Speech" Oliver Sacks described how people who are unable to understand speech due to brain damage can nevertheless correctly assess the sincerity of the speaker.
 According to his assumption, such abilities to interpret human behavior can have animals, for example, domestic dogs.
 Studies conducted in the twentieth century showed that there are two types of genetic variability: hidden and expressed.
 Mutation introduces new genetic variation, while selection removes it from the set of manifest variations.
 Segregation and recombination with each generation shuffle the variation between the two pools.
 In the savannah, primates with a digestive system like humans have difficulty meeting their amino acid requirements from available plant resources.
 Moreover, failure to do so will lead to such serious consequences as slow growth, malnutrition and, ultimately, death.
 The most readily available plant resources would be the proteins found in leaves and legumes, but they are poorly digested by primates such as ourselves if not cooked.
 On the contrary, food of animal origin (ants, termites, eggs) is not only easily digestible, but also represents a rich source of proteins, containing all the essential amino acids.
 Taking into account all the above, it is not surprising that our ancestors solved the "protein problem" in much the same way as chimpanzees in the savannah do to this day.
 Interruption of sleep is a process of deliberate awakening during normal sleep and re-sleeping after a short time (10-60 minutes).
 This can be easily done with a relatively quiet alarm clock to bring you to consciousness without fully waking you.
 If you find yourself resetting your alarm in your sleep, then you can put it on the other side of the room, which will force you to get out of bed to turn it off.
 Other options that are based on biological rhythms include drinking large amounts of liquid (particularly water or tea, a known diuretic) before bed, which causes the person to wake up to urinate.
 The amount of inner peace of a person is inversely proportional to the amount of tension in his body and soul.
 The lower the voltage, the more positive the life force present in you. Every human being is potentially given the ability to find absolute peace and a sense of fulfillment.
 Everyone can achieve enlightenment. The only thing that stands in the way of this goal is our own tension and negative attitude.
 Tibetan Buddhism is based on the teachings of the Buddha, but has been supplemented by the Mahayana path of love and a variety of Indian yoga techniques.
 The principle of Tibetan Buddhism is very simple: it consists of kundalini yoga, meditation and the path of all-embracing love.
 The energy of kundalini (energy of enlightenment) in kundalini yoga is awakened through yoga poses, breathing exercises, mantras and visualizations.
 The heart of Tibetan meditation is Yoga of Deities. Through visualization of various deities, energy channels are cleaned, chakras are activated and the enlightenment of consciousness is achieved.
 Germany was a common enemy in World War II, which led to cooperation between the USSR and the USA. After the war, disagreements regarding the system, process and culture led to discord between the countries.
 Two years after the war ended, the former allies became enemies, and the Cold War began.
 It was to last the next 40 years. It was fought for real, using proxy armies, on battlefields from Africa to Asia, in Afghanistan, Cuba and many other places around the world.
 By 17 September 1939, the Polish defence had already been broken, and the only hope was to retreat and reorganise along the Romanian bridgehead.
 However, these plans became irrelevant almost overnight when about 800,000 soldiers from the Soviet Red Army formed the Belorussian and Ukrainian fronts after the seizure of eastern regions of Poland in violation of the Riga Peace Treaty, the Soviet-Polish Non-Aggression Pact, and other international agreements, bilateral and multilateral.
 The use of ships for the transportation of goods is, of course, the most effective way to transport large numbers of people and goods across the oceans.
 The job of the Navy is traditionally to ensure the ability of the country to move its people and goods, and to simultaneously prevent the ability of the enemy to move its people and goods.
 One of the most notable recent examples of this was the North Atlantic convoys during World War II, when the Americans tried to ferry people and supplies across the Atlantic to help Britain.
 At the same time, the German navy, using mainly its submarines, tried to stop this movement.
 If the anti-Hitler coalition had failed, Germany would probably have been able to conquer Britain as well as the rest of Europe.
 Goats were apparently first domesticated about 10,000 years ago in the Zagros Mountains of Iran.
 Ancient cultures and tribes began to keep them for themselves to have milk, wool, meat and fur.
 Domestic goats were usually kept in herds that roamed the hills or other grazing areas, which were often watched over by children or teenagers, who were known as goatherds, a practice that is still common today.
 Roads for carriages were built in England in the XVI century.
 Although the wagon roads were only wooden planks laid parallel to each other, they allowed horses to carry larger loads and at a higher speed than the slightly more rutted roads of the time.
 Sleepers were used quite a long time ago to keep the rails in place, but it became clear later that the tracks were more effective with an iron plate on top.
 This became common practice, but the iron led to more wear on the wooden wheels of the carriages.
 Over time, wooden wheels were replaced by iron ones. In 1767, the first rails made entirely of iron appeared.
 The first known form of transportation was walking, people began to walk straight two million years ago with the appearance of Homo erectus (which means straight man).
 For their australopithecine ancestors, bipedalism was not so common.
 Bipedal specializations are found in Australopithecus fossils from 4.2–3.9 million years ago, although Sahelanthropus may have walked upright as early as 7 million years ago.
 We can start living more environmentally friendly. We can become members of environmental movements and even activists to at least alleviate further suffering.
 As a rule, it is like treating the symptoms. If we need not just a temporary solution, then we need to find the root of the problems and eliminate it.
 It is obvious that the world has changed a lot under the influence of scientific and technological progress of mankind, and due to overpopulation and extravagant lifestyle of people, the problems have become more serious.
 After the Congress's adoption on July 4, a handwritten draft, signed by Congress President John Hancock and Secretary Charles Thomson, was sent a few blocks away to printer John Dunlap's shop.
 150–200 copies were made overnight, now known as the "Dunlap broadsides".
 The first public reading of this document was made by John Nixon in the yard of Independence Hall on July 8.
 On July 6, one copy was sent to George Washington, who on July 9 ordered it read to his troops in New York. A copy arrived in London on August 10.
 The 25 known Dulap leaflets are the oldest surviving copies of the document. The original handwritten copy has not survived.
 Today, many paleontologists believe that one of the groups of dinosaurs survived and lived to our days. We call them birds.
 They are often not considered dinosaurs because they have feathers and are capable of flight.
 But there is still much to be said about birds that still look like dinosaurs.
 They have claws and teeth, they lay eggs and walk on two back legs like T-Rex.
 Almost all computers that are used today are based on the processing of information that is encoded in the form of binary numbers.
 A binary number can have only one of two values, either 0 or 1. These numbers are called "binary digits" or "bits" if you use computer jargon.
 It may be difficult to immediately identify oral poisoning. Symptoms such as vomiting are too common for a quick diagnosis.
 The best sign of internal poisoning may be the presence of an open container of medicine or toxic household chemical.
 Check the label for specific first aid instructions for this particular poison.
 The term "beetle" is used by entomologists formally to refer to the group of insects.
 This concept comes from the bedbugs known since ancient times – insects that are well adapted to parasitize on humans.
 Both predators and bed bugs are nesting species adapted to living in the nest or dwelling of their host.
 In the United States, there are approximately 400,000 cases of multiple sclerosis (MS), making MS the leading neurological disease of young adults and middle-aged adults.
 Multiple sclerosis is a disease that affects the central nervous system, which consists of the brain, spinal cord and optic nerve.
 Studies have shown that multiple sclerosis affects twice as many women as men.
 A couple may decide that raising a child is not in their best interests or in the best interests of their child.
 These couples can choose to create an adoption plan for their child.
 When adoption or foster care, biological parents give up their parental rights so that another couple can adopt the child.
 The main goal of science is to find out how the world works, using the scientific method. This method is actually the basis of most scientific research.
 It is not, however, the only one. Scientific research is also guided by experimentation (an experiment is a test used to eliminate one or more possible hypotheses), asking questions, and making observations.
 Naturalists and philosophers focused their attention on the ancient texts and especially on the Bible in Latin.
 In all scientific matters, including psychology, the views of Aristotle were adopted.
 As knowledge of the Greek language deteriorated, the West was cut off from its philosophical and scientific Greek roots.
 Many of the observed rhythms in physiology and behavior are often heavily dependent on the presence of endogenous cycles and their production by biological clocks.
 Periodic rhythms, not simply a response to external periodic stimuli, are found in most living organisms, including bacteria, fungi, plants, and animals.
 Biological clocks are self-sustaining oscillators that will continue autonomous cycling for a period of time, even in the absence of external stimuli.
 The Hershey and Chase experiment was one of the first suggestions that DNA was the genetic material.
 Hershey and Chase implanted their DNA into a bacterium using phages, i.e. viruses.
 They conducted two experiments, labeling radioactive phosphorus DNA phage and radioactive phage protein.
 Mutations can cause a wide variety of outcomes, depending on the type of mutation, the importance of the affected stretch of genetic material, and whether the mutated cells are germline cells.
 Only mutations in the cells of the germ line can be passed on to the next generation, while mutations elsewhere can lead to cell death or cancer.
 Nature tourism is interesting for those who like to go to nature to enjoy the landscape, including wild animals and plants.
 Among the examples of active recreation at the facility are hunting, fishing, photography, bird watching, visiting parks and learning about the ecosystem.
 An example is visiting, photographing and studying orangutans in Borneo.
 Every morning people leave small towns in the countryside to go to their place of work, and those whose place of work is in the place they have just left pass by them.
 In this active traffic movement, everyone is in some way connected with the system of transport based on personal cars, and supports it.
 Science now indicates that the vast hydrocarbon economy has affected one of the stable states of the biosphere that has supported human evolution for the past two million years.
 Everyone is a member of society and uses transportation systems. Practically everyone complains about these systems.
 In developed countries, you rarely hear complaints about the quality of water or falling bridges.
 Why do transportation systems receive so many complaints, why do they fail every day? Are transportation engineers simply incompetent, or are there more fundamental reasons?
 The study of the movement of individual drivers and vehicles between two points and their interaction with each other is carried out in the framework of the study of traffic flows.
 Unfortunately, it is difficult to study the intensity of traffic because you can not predict the behavior of the driver with 100% probability.
 Fortunately, the behavior of drivers is often sufficiently systematic; thus, traffic flows in general have some systematicity and can be approximately described mathematically.
 To better represent the traffic flow, the relationships between three main variables were established: (1) flow, (2) density, and (3) speed.
 These relationships help in the planning, design and operation of railroad facilities.
 Insects were the first animals to take to the air, and their ability to fly helped them escape predators, find food and find mates.
 Most insects have the ability to fold their wings along their bodies, which gives them an advantage.
 This provides them with more hiding places in which to escape from predators.
 Dragonflies and damselflies are the only insects that cannot fold their wings back.
 Thousands of years ago, a man named Aristarchus said that the solar system revolves around the sun.
 Many believed him to be right, but many believed the opposite: that the Solar System revolved around the Earth, including the Sun (and even other stars).
 This seems like a reasonable idea, because we don't feel that the Earth is moving, do we?
 The Amazon River is the second longest and the largest river on Earth. It carries more than 8 times the water of the second largest river.
 The Amazon is also the widest river on Earth, with a width that sometimes reaches six miles.
 As much as 20 percent of the water that flows from rivers into the oceans of our planet comes from the Amazon.
 The Amazon River is 6,387 km (3,980 mi) long. It is fed by thousands of smaller rivers.
 Although the construction of stone pyramids continued until the end of the Old Kingdom, the size and technical perfection of the pyramids at Giza was never surpassed.
 In the new kingdom of the ancient Egyptians, they admired the monuments created by their predecessors more than a thousand years ago.
 The Vatican City State has a population of about 800 people, making it the smallest independent country in the world, as well as the country with the smallest population.
 The Vatican uses Italian in its legislation and official communications.
 Italian is also the everyday language for most people working in the state, while Latin is often used in religious ceremonies.
 All citizens of Vatican are Catholics.
 People since ancient times were known basic chemical elements such as gold, silver and copper, as they can all be found in nature in its pure form and relatively easy to extract with primitive tools.
 The philosopher Aristotle believed that everything is made up of a mixture of one or more of the four elements: earth, water, air, and fire.
 They were like four states of matter (in the same order): solid, liquid, gas and plasma, though he also suggested that they transitioned into a new state to make what we see.
 Alloys are essentially a mixture of two or more metals. Don't forget that there are many elements in the periodic table.
 Elements such as calcium and potassium are considered metals. Of course, there are also metals such as silver and gold.
 It is also possible to make alloys that contain small amounts of non-metallic elements such as carbon.
 Everything in the universe is made of matter. All matter is made of tiny particles called atoms.
 Atoms are so incredibly tiny that trillions of them could fit into the point at the end of this sentence.
 Thus, the pencil became a good friend for many people when it appeared.
 It is sad that when new ways of writing appeared, the pencil lost its former status and was used less.
 Now people write messages on computer screens, and they never have to deal with a typewriter.
 It is only a guess what will happen to the keyboard, with the advent of newer technologies.
 The atomic bomb works on the principle that in order for many protons and neutrons to be in one nucleus, energy is needed.
 It's like rolling a heavy cart up a hill. Then the re-splitting of the nucleus releases some of that energy.
 Some atoms have unstable nuclei, which means they tend to decay with little or no outside influence.
 The surface of the Moon is made of rocks and dust. The outer layer of the Moon is called the crust.
 The thickness of the crust is about 70 km under the oceans and 100 km under the continents.
 It is thinner under the lunar seas and thicker under the highlands.
 The visible side may have more lunar seas because the crust is thinner there, and lava was easier to rise to the surface.
 Content theories focus on finding what makes people act or what might interest them.
 These theories suggest that people have certain needs and/or desires that build up inside them as they grow up.
 These theories address what causes particular people to want to do what they do, and what causes their environment to cause them to do or not do certain things.
 Two popular theories about content are Maslow's "Needs Pyramid" and Herzberg's "Two-Factor Theory of Motivation".
 Typically, two types of behavior can be observed when managers begin to manage people who were previously equal to them in status. One extreme of the spectrum is an attempt to remain "your guy" (or girl).
 It is difficult for such managers to make unpopular decisions, take disciplinary measures, evaluate the results of work, distribute responsibilities and hold employees accountable.
 At the other end of the spectrum, a person becomes an unrecognizable individual who feels that he must change everything the team has done and take credit for it.
 After all, the leader is ultimately responsible for the success or failure of the team.
 This behavior often leads to conflicts between leaders and the rest of the team.
 Virtual teams adhere to the same standards of excellence as conventional teams, but there are some small differences.
 Virtual team members often serve as a point of contact for their immediate physical group.
 They are usually more autonomous than employees from traditional teams, because their teams can meet according to different time zones, which can not always understand the local management.
 The presence of a real "invisible team" (Larson and LaFasto, 1989, p. 109) is also a unique component of the virtual team.
 The "invisible team" is a team of leaders, to which each participant reports. The invisible team sets the norms for each participant.
 Why would an organization go through the laborious process of creating a self-organizing organization? One of the goals of applying the concepts of self-organizing organizations in practice is innovation.
 When all available resources are effectively used in all functional units of the organization, creativity and inventiveness can manifest themselves.
 In the end, the concerted efforts of the organization to overcome the obstacle can lead to a new innovative process, which will meet the interests of the client.
 Before an organization can become innovative, leaders must create a culture of innovation, knowledge sharing and learning.
 Angel (2006) explains the Continuum Approach as a method used to help organizations achieve higher levels of effectiveness.
 The data of neuroscience give physical evidence for the theoretical approach to the study of consciousness, thus narrowing the field of research and making it much more precise.
 The relationship between brain pathology and behavior is used by scientists in their research.
 It has long been known that various types of damage, trauma, injury and tumors of the brain affect behavior and cause changes in some mental functions.
 The emergence of new technologies allows us to see and explore previously unseen structures and processes of the brain.
 This gives us a large amount of data and materials for creating simulation models that help us understand the processes occurring in our consciousness.
 Despite the fact that AI is firmly associated with science fiction, it forms a very important direction of computer science, which studies the behavior and training of machines and "imparting" them intelligence.
 AI research involves building machines to automate tasks that require intelligent behavior.
 Here are some examples that can be given: control, planning and creation of a schedule, reaction to diagnoses and customer questions, as well as recognition of the face, handwriting and voice.
 Such questions are singled out into separate disciplines, the purpose of which is to solve the problems that we face in everyday life.
 Nowadays, AI system is often used in the fields of economy, medicine, engineering and military sphere, being embedded in some software applications for home computers and video games.
 Field trips are very important for any class. Very often teachers want to take their students to places that can not be reached by bus.
 Technology offers a solution with virtual tours. Students can explore museum exhibits, visit an aquarium or enjoy fine art, all while sitting with their class.
 Posting a tour in a virtual space for all to see is also a great way to refresh your memory of the tour and share your knowledge with future classes.
 For example, each year students at Bennett High School in North Carolina create a website about their visit to the state capital, and each year the site is updated, but access to the old versions is still preserved - they serve as a memorial album.
 Blogs can also improve writing skills in students. Although students often start their blog using sloppy grammar and spelling, this usually changes due to the presence of an audience.
 Since students are often the most critical audience, the blog author begins to strive for perfection in his writing in order to avoid criticism.
 Also, by blogging, "students begin to better understand the world around them." Students are inspired to be smart and interesting, attracting the attention of readers (Toto, 2004).
 Blogging is a collaborative tool and it motivates students to extend the learning process far beyond the traditional school day.
 Proper use of blogs can enable students to become more analytical and critical. By actively responding to online materials, students can define their position in the context of others’ work, as well as articulate their own views on specific issues (Oravec, 2002).
 Ottawa is a lovely bilingual capital of Canada with a huge number of art galleries and museums that open the past and present of Canada.
 Further south is Niagara Falls, and the north is the domain of unspoiled natural beauty of Muskoka and surrounding areas.
 All this and much more makes Ontario something truly Canadian in the eyes of foreigners.
 Large areas further north are sparsely populated, and some are virtually uninhabited.
 An amazing comparison of population numbers: there are more African Americans in the US than there are citizens in Canada.
 The East African islands are located in the Indian Ocean off the east coast of Africa.
 Madagascar is much larger than other and is a unique continent in terms of wildlife.
 Almost all of the smaller islands are independent states or associated with France and known as luxurious beach resorts.
 The Arabs also brought Islam to the region, especially it took root on the Comoros and Mayotte.
 The spread of European influence and colonization began in the 15th century, when the Portuguese explorer Vasco da Gama opened a route through the Cape of Good Hope from Europe to India.
 In the north, the region is bounded by the Sahel, and to the south and west by the Atlantic Ocean.
 For women: All tourists are advised to say they are married, regardless of their actual marital status.
 It is also useful to wear a ring (but not too expensive looking).
 Women should be aware that because of cultural differences, they may feel harassed, followed, touched, etc.
 Firmly refuse men and do not be afraid to stand up for yourself (this is unacceptable regardless of cultural differences!).
 The modern city of Casablanca was founded by Berber fishermen in the 10th century BC. It was used by the Romans, Phoenicians and the Merinids as a strategic port, called Anfa.
 The Portuguese destroyed it and rebuilt it under the name of Caz-Branca, but left it after the earthquake of 1755.
 The Sultan of Morocco rebuilt the city under the name of Ed-Dar-el-Bayda, and the Spanish merchants who had established trading posts there called it Casablanca.
 Casablanca is one of the least interesting places for shopping in all of Morocco.
 Around the old medina it is easy to find places where traditional Moroccan goods are sold, such as tajines, pottery, leather goods, hookahs and a whole assortment of trinkets, but all this is for tourists.
 Goma is a tourist city in the far east of the Democratic Republic of the Congo, on the border with Rwanda.
 In 2002, the city of Goma was destroyed by the lava of the Nyiragongo volcano, which buried most of the city's streets, especially the central part of the city.
 Although Goma is a relatively safe place, it is advisable to check information about any trips outside Goma to understand the state of the fighting in the North Kivu province.
 This city is also the starting point for climbing the volcano Nyiragongo, and here you can see mountain gorillas in the wild at one of the cheapest prices in Africa.
 You can go to Goma by bodaboda (motorcycle taxi). The usual (local) price is 500 Congolese francs for a short trip.
 Due to its relative inaccessibility, Timbuktu has become a metaphor for an exotic faraway land.
 Today, Timbuktu is a poor city, but its reputation attracts tourists, and it has an airport.
 In 1990 it was added to the list of world heritage in danger due to the danger of the desert sands.
 When filming the transmission of Henry Louis Gates "Wonders of the African World" on PBS channel one of the most important stops was made here.
 This city is very different from other cities in the country, as it is dominated by Arabic rather than African.
 Kruger National Park is located in the northeast of South Africa, along the border with Mozambique in the east, with Zimbabwe in the north, its southern border is the Crocodile River.
 The park area is 19 500 km²; it is divided into 14 different ecozones, each of which is a habitat for different wild animals.
 It is one of the main attractions of South Africa and is considered to be the leading among South African National Parks (SANParks).
 As in all South African national parks, there is a daily conservation fee for the park and its visit.
 It may also be worthwhile to buy a Wild Card, which allows you to visit South African national parks either selectively or all.
 The territory of Hong Kong was named after the island of Hong Kong, a place that many tourists consider the main object of their attention.
 A string of buildings forming the line of the Hong Kong skyline is compared to a glittering bar chart, highlighted by the water of Victoria Harbour.
 To see the most picturesque places of Hong Kong, you should leave the island and go to the coast of the peninsula of Chu Lung, which is located opposite.
 The majority of the urban development of Hong Kong Island is concentrated on reclaimed land on the north shore.
 This is the place that British colonizers took for themselves, and if you are looking for evidence of the colonial past of the territory, this is a good place to start.
 Sundarbans is the largest belt of coastal mangrove forests, stretching 80 km (50 miles) from the shore into the mainland of Bangladesh and India.
 Sundarbans has been declared a UNESCO World Heritage Site. Part of the forest within the Indian territory is called Sundarbans National Park.
 These forests are not just mangrove swamps — they also include some of the last remaining primeval jungles that once covered the Gangetic plains.
 Sundarbans covers an area of 3850 sq km, of which about one-third is covered by water or swamps.
 Since 1966 Sundarbans has been a wildlife sanctuary, and it is estimated that there are now 400 Bengal tigers and about 30,000 spotted deer on the island.
 Buses leave from the intercity bus station (across the river) throughout the day, though most, especially those heading east and to Jakarta/Bandung, leave between 06:30 and 07:30.
 Since intercity buses are often crowded, it is advisable to purchase a ticket a few days in advance.
 Most areas are served by small Japanese buses Coaster, comfortable and reliable.
 The minibus is a quick and convenient way to get to places like Paro (150 ngultrums) and Punakha (200 ngultrums).
 The Oyapock Bridge is a cable-stayed bridge that spans the Oyapock River and connects the cities of Oiapoque in Brazil and Saint-Georges-de-l'Oyapock in French Guiana.
 These two towers reach 83 meters in height, and the bridge itself is 378 meters long and has two lanes 3.5 meters wide.
 The height of the substructure is 15 meters. The construction was completed in August 2011, it was not opened for traffic until March 2017.
 According to the plan, the bridge will be fully operational in September 2017, when Brazilian customs checkpoints are expected to be completed.
 The Guarani were the most significant indigenous group inhabiting the region that is now eastern Paraguay, they lived as semi-nomadic hunter-gatherers who also practiced subsistence agriculture.
 The Chaco region served as home to various groups of indigenous peoples, such as the Guaycuru and the Payaaguas, who survived by hunting, gathering, and fishing.
 In the 16th century, Paraguay, which was previously called the "great province of the East Indies", arose as a result of the clash of Spanish conquerors with local indigenous groups.
 The Spanish began a period of colonization that lasted three centuries.
 Since the founding of Asuncion in 1537, Paraguay has largely managed to preserve much of its distinctive character and identity.
 Argentina is known for having one of the best teams, as well as the best players in the world in a sport like polo.
 The biggest tournament of the year is held in December on the polo fields in Las Canitas.
 Less major tournaments and matches here can also be seen at other times of the year.
 To find out about polo matches and where to buy tickets, visit the website of the Argentine Polo Association.
 The official currency of the Falkland Islands is the Falkland Islands pound (FKP), the value of which is equivalent to the value of one British pound sterling (GBP).
 Money can be exchanged at the only bank on the islands, which is located in Port Stanley opposite the FIC West shop.
 British pounds will generally be accepted everywhere on the islands, and US dollars and credit cards are also often accepted in Stanley.
 In remote islands, credit cards may not be accepted, although British and American currency may be accepted; clarify with the owners in advance what method of payment is acceptable.
 The Falkland Islands pound is almost impossible to exchange outside the islands, so exchange your money before you leave.
 Since Montevideo is located south of the equator, there is summer when it is winter in the Northern Hemisphere, and vice versa.
 Montevideo is located in the subtropics. In the summer months, the air temperature above +30 ° C is a common phenomenon.
 Winters can be deceptively cold: temperatures rarely drop below freezing, but the combination of wind and humidity creates a colder-feeling climate than the thermometer indicates.
 There are no particularly "rainy" and "dry" seasons: the amount of precipitation is approximately the same throughout the year.
 Although many animals in the park are used to seeing people, nature is still wild, so do not feed or disturb the animals.
 The park administration warns: do not approach more than 100 yards/meters to bears and wolves, and more than 25 yards/meters to all other wild animals!
 No matter how docile they look, bison, moose, bears and almost all large animals can attack.
 Every year, dozens of visitors are injured because they do not respect the necessary distance. These animals are large, wild and potentially dangerous, so respect their personal space.
 Also, remember that smells attract bears and other wild animals, so avoid cooking or carrying smelly foods with you, and keep your camp clean.
 Apia is the capital of Samoa. The city is located on the island of Upolu and has a population of just under 40,000 inhabitants.
 Apia was founded in the 1850s and has been the official capital of Samoa since 1959.
 The bay was the site of a notorious naval standoff in 1889, when seven ships from Germany, the United States and Britain refused to leave the bay.
 All the ships sank, except for one British cruiser. About 200 American and German sailors died.
 During the Mau movement for independence, a peaceful meeting in the town led to the assassination of the supreme chief Tupua Tamasese Lealof III.
 There are many beaches here, as Auckland is located on the shores of two harbors. The most popular beaches are located in three areas.
 The beaches of North Shore (in the area of North Harbour) are washed by the Pacific Ocean and stretch from Long Bay in the north to Devonport in the south.
 Almost all of these beaches are sandy with safe swimming, and many of them are shady thanks to trees such as the pohutukawa.
 In the central area of Auckland, where the Waitemata Harbour is located, the prestigious residential suburbs of Mt Eden and St Heliers, the Tamaki Drive beaches are located.
 These are sometimes crowded family beaches with a good selection of shops along the shore. Swimming is safe.
 The most popular local beer is "Number One", it has a simple, pleasant and refreshing taste. Another local beer is called "Manta".
 There are many French wines that can be drunk, however New Zealand and Australian wines can be transported better.
 Local tap water is perfectly safe to drink, but if you are still worried, it is easy to find bottled water.
 Australians do not understand the idea of "flat white". "Little black" is an espresso, cappuccino they serve with a high layer of whipped cream (not with foam), and tea without milk.
 Hot chocolate meets Belgian standards. Although fruit juices are expensive, they are of excellent quality.
 There are a large number of trips to the reef all year round, and injuries caused by any of these reasons on the reef are rare.
 Still, follow the recommendations of the authorities, obey all signs and pay close attention to safety warnings.
 Cubomedusa is found near beaches and river mouths north of 1770 from October to April, and sometimes outside this period.
 Sharks do exist, but rarely attack humans. Most sharks are afraid of humans and swim away.
 The crocodiles do not lead an active life in the ocean, and their main habitat is the estuaries of rivers north of Rockhampton.
 Advance booking allows the traveler not to worry about where to stay upon arrival at the destination.
 Travel agents often make deals with specific hotels, but you can book through the travel agent and other forms of accommodation, such as camping sites.
 Tour operators usually sell package deals that include breakfast, transfer to/from the airport or even combined packages that include the flight and hotel stay.
 They can also hold the reservation if you need time to consider the offer or obtain other documents for the destination (e.g. visa).
 Any changes or requests must be sent to the travel agency first, not directly to the hotel.
 At some music festivals, the vast majority of attendees sleep on the festival grounds, and most consider this a mandatory part of the program.
 If you want to be close to the stage, you need to arrive early to find a camping spot near the music.
 Remember that even if the music on the main stages may have finished, there may be areas on the festival where the music will continue until late into the night.
 Some festivals have special camping areas for families with small children.
 If you are crossing the northern part of the Baltic Sea in winter, find out about the location of the cabin, as the passage through the ice leads to a rather eerie noise, which can disturb the most sensitive people.
 Cruises to St. Petersburg include city tours. Cruise passengers are exempt from visa requirements (check conditions).
 Casinos usually make every effort to keep visitors as long as possible and spend as much money as possible in the institution. There are no windows and clocks, and the exits are difficult to find.
 They usually offer special food, drinks and entertainment to keep guests happy and not leave the premises.
 Some establishments offer free alcohol. However, intoxication clouds the mind, and all good players know how important it is to stay sober.
 Anyone who is going to travel in high-altitude areas or over mountain passes should be aware of the possibility of snow, ice or frost.
 On an icy and snowy road, the friction is low, and you can not drive the car as on a regular asphalt.
 During a blizzard, enough snow to get stuck can fall in a very short period of time.
 Visibility may also be limited due to snow, sleet, fog, or ice on the windshield.
 On the other hand, weather conditions with snow and ice are normal in many countries, and road traffic continues all year round almost without interruption.
 Safari is probably the biggest tourist attraction in Africa and the main event for many travelers.
 The term "safari" in everyday use means a land trip to see the amazing wildlife of Africa, especially in the savannah.
 Some animals, such as elephants or giraffes, often approach cars, so you can get a good view with ordinary equipment.
 Lions, cheetahs and leopards are sometimes shy and you will see them better through binoculars.
 A walking safari (also called a "bushwalking safari" or "walking safari") is a hike of several hours to several days.
 The Paralympic Games will take place from August 24 to September 5, 2021, with some events taking place in different locations across Japan.
 Tokyo will be the only city in Asia to host the Summer Olympics twice. The first time was in 1964.
 If you booked flights and accommodation for 2020 before the date was announced, you may have a tricky situation on your hands.
 Cancellation policies may vary, but as of late March, most coronavirus-related rules do not apply to July 2020, when the Olympics were scheduled to take place.
 Most tickets for the events are expected to cost between 2,500 and 130,000 yen, with a standard ticket price of around 7,000 yen.
 Ironing wet clothes helps them dry. Many hotels rent an iron and ironing board, even if they are not in the room.
 If you don't have an iron or you're not keen on the idea of wearing ironed socks, you can try a hair dryer if you have one.
 Do not expose the fabric to too high temperatures (which can cause shrinkage or, in very rare cases, burns).
 There are different ways to clean water, some of them more effective against specific threats.
 In some places, it is enough to boil water for a minute, in others it will take several minutes.
 Filters are effective in different ways, and in case of doubt you should consider buying water in sealed bottles and from a reputable company.
 Travelers may encounter pests they haven't seen in their home countries.
 Pests can spoil food, cause irritation or, worse, cause allergic reactions, release toxins or transmit infection.
 Infectious diseases themselves or dangerous animals that can cause damage or death to humans are not generally considered pests.
 Duty-free shopping is the opportunity to buy goods in certain points without taxes and duties.
 Travelers heading to high-tax countries can sometimes save a significant amount, especially on items like alcohol and tobacco.
 The stretch between Point Marion and Fermont has the most difficult driving conditions on the Buffalo-Pittsburgh Expressway, often passing through isolated, hilly, and wooded terrain.
 If you are not used to driving on country roads, be on your guard: there are steep slopes, narrow alleys and sharp turns.
 The speed limits are noticeably lower than on the previous and subsequent sections — usually 35-40 mph (56-64 km/h) — and strict compliance with them is even more important than elsewhere.
 Oddly enough, mobile phone coverage is much better here than in many other parts of the route, such as Pennsylvania Wilds.
 German pastry is quite good. In Bavaria it is very abundant and varied and resembles the pastry of their southern neighbour, Austria.
 Fruit cakes are common, apple cakes are available all year round, and cherries and plums appear in the summer.
 In German baking often used almonds, hazelnuts and other tree nuts. Often popular cakes are perfectly combined with a cup of strong coffee.
 If you want small, but filling, baked goods, try what is, depending on the region, called oladji or donuts with filling.
 Curry is a dish made from spices and herbs combined with meat or vegetables.
 Depending on the liquid content, curry can be "dry" or "wet".
 In the interior of Pakistan and northern India, yogurt is actively used in curry. In southern India and certain regions on the coast of the subcontinent, coconut milk is usually used.
 Indonesian cuisine, having 17,000 islands to choose from, is a general term used to refer to the vast variety of regional cuisines found throughout the country.
 But without qualification, the term most often refers to food from the central and eastern parts of the main island of Java.
 The cuisine of Java, now widely spread throughout the archipelago, includes a variety of unpretentious dishes. The Javanese prefer such flavorings as peanuts, chili, sugar (especially Javanese coconut sugar) and various aromatic spices.
 Strings are supports for the rider's legs, hanging from both sides of the saddle.
 They provide the rider with better stability, but there may be safety issues as there is a risk of foot entrapment.
 If the horse has thrown the rider, but his leg is stuck in the stirrup, the running horse can drag him along. To minimize this risk, you can take a number of precautions.
 First, most riders wear riding boots with a heel, which have a smooth and fairly thin sole.
 In addition, individual saddles, especially English ones, are equipped with safety sparks, thanks to which the leather stirrup falls off the saddle if it is pulled back by a falling rider.
 The Coquimbo Valley is the main destination in Chile for mountaineering. It is known as the Yosemite of South America and has a large number of big granite walls and cliffs.
 At the top you can enjoy stunning mountain scenery. Climbers from all over the world are constantly creating new routes in its enormous potential for mountaineering.
 Winter mountain sports, including skiing and snowboarding, are popular sports that involve descending a snow-covered terrain on skis or a snowboard attached to the feet.
 Skiing is the main tourist destination for many skiers (sometimes called "ski bums") who plan their vacation around skiing at a particular location.
 The idea of skiing is very old: rock paintings depicting skiers date back to 5000 BC!
 Skiing as a sport dates back at least to the 17th century, and in 1861, Norwegians opened the first recreational ski club in Australia.
 Ski touring is also called backcountry, skitouring or hiking on skis.
 This involves, but usually does not include, walking up to the summit and then descending down unprepared slopes, as skiing down the flats requires more rigid skis and boots.
 Imagine that the ski route is a pedestrian route.
 Under good conditions, you can cover several times more distance than when walking, but you can only develop such speed on skis in very rare cases, when you do not have a heavy backpack and there is a groomed ski trail.
 Europe is a relatively small continent, but it has many independent states, and in ordinary circumstances, traveling through many countries would mean having to apply for visas and go through passport control many times.
 But the Schengen area in this regard functions as a single country.
 While in this zone, you can usually cross the border without going through passport control again.
 Similarly, if you have a Schengen visa, you do not need to apply for a visa in each of the Schengen countries separately, which will save you time and money, as well as avoiding paperwork.
 There is no universal definition of what constitutes an antique. Some tax authorities define goods that are 100 years old as antiques.
 This concept has geographical varieties in which the age limit in places like North America may be less than in Europe.
 Handicrafts can be defined as antiques, despite the fact that they are younger than similar mass-produced goods.
 Reindeer herding is an important source of livelihood for the Sami people, and the culture surrounding this activity is also important for many other professions.
 Although this is the tradition, not all representatives of the Saami people engaged in mass breeding of reindeer; they lived fishing, hunting and other similar crafts, using reindeer mainly as pack animals.
 Today many Saami are employed in modern professions. Tourism is an important source of income in the Saami region of Lapland.
 Although the word "Gypsy" is widely used, especially among non-Roma, it is often considered offensive because of associations with negative stereotypes and misconceptions about the Roma people.
 If the country you are going to visit is under a travel advisory, it may affect your travel insurance or your cancellation insurance.
 You may also want to consult other governments besides your own, but their advice is aimed at their own citizens.
 Here's one example: U.S. citizens in the Middle East may face situations that Europeans or Arabs cannot.
 The information reports only briefly describe the political situation in one country.
 The views expressed are often superficial, vague and overly simplified compared to the more detailed information that is widely available.
 Adverse weather conditions are a general term for any dangerous weather phenomenon that can cause damage, serious social disruption, or loss of life.
 Adverse weather conditions are everywhere around the world, and they are of various types, which depend on geography, terrain and atmospheric conditions.
 Strong winds, hail, heavy rainfall and forest fires are manifestations and effects of severe weather phenomena such as storms, tornadoes, waterspouts and hurricanes.
 Regional and seasonal hazardous weather phenomena include blizzards, snowstorms, ice and dust storms.
 Travellers are strongly advised to take into account any risks associated with harsh weather in their area, as they may affect any travel plans.
 Anyone planning to visit a country that may be considered a war zone should receive professional training.
 A search on the Internet for the phrase "survival course in a hostile environment" may yield the address of a local company.
 The course usually covers much more in detail all the topics covered here, often with practical training.
 The course usually lasts from 2 to 5 days and includes playing out situations, a large amount of first aid information and sometimes weapons training.
 Books and magazines about survival in wild conditions are common, but publications about war zones are not so common.
 People planning to have gender reassignment surgery abroad should make sure they have valid documents for the return journey.
 The willingness of governments to issue passports without specifying gender (X) or documents updated to reflect the desired name and gender varies from place to place.
 The willingness of foreign governments to fulfill their obligations under these documents is equally varied.
 Security checks at checkpoints have also become much more thorough since the events of September 11, 2001.
 Transgender people preparing for surgery should not expect to be able to pass through the scanners and have their privacy and dignity respected.
 Surges — a current created by waves that break on the shore, or sometimes on a reef or something similar.
 The return flow is concentrated in a few deeper areas where rapid flow can occur, going to greater depths, due to similar underwater topography.
 Most deaths occur as a result of exhaustion when trying to swim back against the current, which may be impossible.
 Once you get out of the current, swimming back will not be any harder than usual.
 Try to go somewhere where you won't be caught again, or, depending on your skills and whether you were seen, you may want to wait for rescue.
 Culture shock upon returning to one's home country comes earlier than cultural shock (here a shorter, more romantic period), lasts longer, and can be more severe.
 Travelers who easily adapt to a new culture sometimes find it especially difficult to re-adapt to their own culture.
 When you return home after living abroad, you are adapted to a new culture and have lost some of your home culture.
 When you first went abroad, people were likely to treat you with patience and understanding, knowing that travelers need to adjust to a new country.
 It may be surprising to people that patience and understanding are also needed for travelers returning home.
 The sound and light show against the backdrop of the pyramid is one of the most interesting events in this area for children.
 The pyramids can be seen in the dark, and you can also see them in silence before the show begins.
 Usually there is always the noise of tourists and vendors. The history of sound and light is like a book with stories.
 The Sphinx acts as a backdrop and narrator of a long story.
 The scenes show on the pyramids, and different pyramids are illuminated.
 Several countries claim the South Shetland Islands, which are home to the most bases and in 2020, sixteen were operational.
 The archipelago is located 120 kilometers from the peninsula. The largest island is named after King George with the settlement of Villa las Estrellas.
 Others include Livingston Island and Deception, where the submerged caldera of an active volcano is a spectacular natural harbor.
 The land of the Antarctic Peninsula is an area south of the Antarctic Peninsula, washed by the sea of Bellingshausen.
 The mountains of this peninsula here merge with the plateau, and then rise again and form a 360-kilometer mountain system of Elsworth, divided by the Minnesota glacier into two parts.
 In the northern part, that is, on the ridge of the Sentinele, are the highest mountains of Antarctica - the massif of Vinson, the highest point of which reaches 4892 m and is called Vinson Peak.
 In remote places outside the mobile phone coverage area, a satellite phone may be your only option.
 A satellite phone is not a replacement for a mobile phone, as you need to be outside in a direct line of sight with the satellite to make a call.
 The service is often used in shipping, including pleasure and high-speed craft, where there is a need for remote data and voice communication.
 You will usually be able to get more information about connecting this service by contacting your local telephone company.
 An option that is becoming increasingly popular for those planning to take a gap year is to travel and study.
 This is especially popular among high school graduates, allowing them to take a year off before entering university without jeopardizing their education.
 In many cases, taking a course abroad during an academic vacation can actually increase your chances of getting into higher education at home.
 As a rule, when applying to such educational programs, a fee is charged for training.
 Finland is a great place for boating. In the "land of a thousand lakes" there are also thousands of islands on the lakes and in the archipelagos.
 Exploring archipelagos or visiting lakes, you can easily do without a yacht.
 While the coastal archipelagos and largest lakes can accommodate any yacht, smaller boats or even kayaks leave completely different impressions.
 Boating is a national pastime in Finland, with one boat for seven or eight people.
 A similar situation is with Norway, Sweden and New Zealand, but in other cases it is quite unique (for example, in the Netherlands this value ranges from one to forty).
 Most Baltic cruises include an extended stop in Russian St. Petersburg.
 This means that you can spend several full days in this historic city, and sleep – to return to the ship.
 If you go to the shore only as an excursion on the ship, you do not need a separate visa (since 2009).
 Some cruise brochures feature Berlin, Germany. As you can see on the map above, Berlin is far from the sea and a visit to the city is not included in the cruise price.
 Flying on an airplane can be scary for anyone of any age or social status, especially if it is their first flight or if they have had a traumatic experience in the past.
 There is nothing to be ashamed of: it is no different from personal dislike and fear of other things that many people have.
 Understanding how an airplane works and what happens during a flight can help overcome the fear that arises from not knowing or being unable to control the process.
 Delivery services are well paid for fast delivery. Often the speed of delivery of commercial documents, goods or spare parts for urgent repair is very important.
 Some routes have their own planes, but for other routes and smaller companies, this was a problem.
 If they sent anything as air cargo, it could take several days to unload and clear customs on some routes.
 The only way to deal with it faster is to send it as checked baggage. The airline's regulations do not allow baggage to be sent without a passenger, so you need to be involved.
 The most obvious way to fly first or business class is to pay for the privilege (or, better yet, get your company to pay for you).
 However, it is not cheap — by experience in a rough approximation you will pay  four times more than the usual economy class for business and eleven times more for first class!
 As a rule, there is no point in even looking for discounts on business class or first class for direct flights from A to B.
 Airlines know that there is a certain core group of passengers who are willing to pay a premium to get somewhere quickly and comfortably, so they charge accordingly.
 The capital of Moldova is Chisinau. The local language is Romanian, but Russian is also widely spoken.
 Moldova is a multi-ethnic republic, which became a victim of ethnic conflict.
 In 1994, this conflict led to the creation of the self-proclaimed Transnistrian Republic in eastern Moldova, which has its own government and currency, but is not recognized by any UN member state.
 Despite the failure of political negotiations, economic ties between the two parts of Moldova were restored.
 The main religion in Moldova is Orthodox Christianity.
 Izmir is the third largest city in Turkey with a population of about 3.7 million, the largest port after Istanbul and a major transportation hub.
 Once an ancient city of Smyrna today is a modern, developed and bustling trade center, located along the huge bay and surrounded by mountains.
 Broad boulevards, glass-fronted buildings and modern shopping malls are interspersed with traditional red-tiled roofs, an 18th-century market, old mosques and churches, although the city has more of a Mediterranean European feel than traditional Turkey.
 From the village of Halldorsvik opens a view of the nearby island of Estur, also there is an unusual octagonal church.
 On the church cemetery over some graves there are interesting marble sculptures of pigeons.
 It is worth to spend half an hour and walk around the unusual village.
 Not far to the north is the romantic and charming town of Sintra, sung by Lord Byron and made famous throughout the world.
 Scotturb bus number 403 makes regular trips to Sintra and stops at Cabo da Roca.
 Further north, visit the Great Temple of Our Lady of Fatima (the mausoleum) – the place of the world-famous apparitions of the Virgin Mary.
 Please remember that you are, in principle, standing on a place of a brotherly grave, as well as a place that is unspeakably important for a considerable percentage of the inhabitants of the globe.
 There are still many men and women alive who survived their stay here, but there are even more people whose loved ones were killed here or worked to death here, whether they were Jews or people of other nationalities.
 Please treat this place with all the dignity, seriousness and respect it deserves. Don't joke about the Holocaust and Nazis.
 Do not deface this place by painting or scratching graffiti on the objects around.
 The official languages of Barcelona are Catalan and Spanish. About half of the population prefers to speak Catalan, most understand it, and almost everyone knows Spanish.
 However, most signs are only in Catalan, as it is the first official language by law.
 However, Spanish is also widely used in public transport and other public places.
 The usual announcements in the metro are made only in Catalan, but unscheduled interruptions are announced by an automated system in a variety of languages, including Spanish, English, French, Arabic and Japanese.
 Parisians are known to be self-centered, rude and arrogant.
 While it is often just a false stereotype, the best way to succeed in Paris is to behave as a "bien élevé" (well-bred) person. This will make it much easier to adapt to the city.
 The unfriendly appearance of Parisians will immediately disappear, if you show a little elementary politeness.
 Plitvice Lakes National Park is heavily forested, mainly with beech, spruce and pine, and represents a mixture of alpine and Mediterranean vegetation.
 Due to the combination of microclimates, different soils and altitude differences, it is particularly diverse plant communities.
 The area is teeming with a huge variety of different species of animals and birds.
 Here you can meet rare representatives of fauna, for example, the European brown bear, wolf, eagle, owl, lynx, wild cat and hawk, as well as many other common species of animals.
 When visiting monasteries, women should be dressed in skirts below the knee and with their shoulders covered.
 Most monasteries will give you robes if you come unprepared, but if you bring your own, especially if they are brightly colored, the monk or nun at the entrance will smile at you.
 Similarly, men should wear pants that cover their knees.
 They can also be taken at the entrance, but this clothing is not washed after each use, so you may not be comfortable in these skirts. One size fits all men!
 The cuisine of Majorca, like that of similar Mediterranean regions, is based on vegetables, bread and meat (especially pork), with the widespread use of olive oil.
 A simple and popular lunch dish, especially in summer, is Pa-amb-oli: bread with olive oil, tomatoes and any filling such as cheese, tuna, etc.
 All nouns, as well as the word Sie, meaning You, are always written with a capital letter even in the middle of a sentence.
 It is important to distinguish between verbs and complements.
 It also makes reading easier, while writing is somewhat more complicated because it is necessary to determine whether the verb or adjective is in the substantivized form.
 Pronunciation in Italian is relatively simple, as most words are pronounced exactly as they are spelled.
 One should be especially careful with the letters c and g, as their pronunciation changes depending on the following vowel.
 Also, remember that r and rr are pronounced differently: caro means "dear" and carro means "cart".
 In Persian language, the grammar is relatively easy and mostly regular.
 Therefore, reading this textbook of Persian grammar will help you to learn a lot of new things and to understand the expressions better.
 Obviously, if you speak a Romance language, it will be easier for you to learn Portuguese.
 However, people who know a little Spanish may hastily conclude that Portuguese is similar enough and can be learned without separate instruction.
 Ancient observatories are generally considered obsolete today and serve as museums or educational institutions.
 Since light pollution was not such a problem during their heyday, they are usually located in cities or on campuses, which are easier to reach than those built in our time.
 Most modern research telescopes are huge structures in remote locations with favorable atmospheric conditions.
 The contemplation of the blooming of the cherry tree, called "hanami", entered the Japanese culture in the VIII century.
 This idea came from China, where the favorite flower was the color of the plum.
 In Japan, the first celebrations of the sakura bloom were arranged by the emperor only for himself and other members of the aristocracy at the imperial court.
 Plants look best in their natural habitat, so don't be tempted to take even one specimen.
 Visiting an officially organized garden for "sampling" will also result in you being kicked out without any talk.
 Singapore is generally a very safe place to be, where it is easy to navigate and almost everything can be bought upon arrival.
 But, being in the "deep tropics" only a few degrees north of the equator, you will have to cope with both the heat (constantly) and the strong sun (when the sky is clear, less often).
 There are also several buses going north to Hebron, the legendary burial place of the biblical patriarchs Abraham, Isaac and Jacob, and their wives.
 Make sure the bus you are getting on is going to Hebron, not just the nearby Jewish settlement Kiryat Arba.
 Inland waterways can be a good theme for any holiday.
 For example, visiting castles in the Loire Valley, the Rhine Valley, cruising on the Danube, or traveling by boat on the Erie Canal.
 They also identify routes for popular walking and cycling routes.
 Christmas is one of the most important holidays in Christianity, and it is celebrated as the birthday of Jesus.
 Many traditions associated with this holiday have also been adopted by non-believers in Christian countries and non-Christians around the world.
 There is a tradition to spend Easter night, not going to bed, in some open place to see the sunrise.
 Of course, this tradition has a Christian theological explanation, but it may well be a pre-Christian ritual of spring and fertility.
 More traditional churches often hold Easter services on Saturday evening during the Easter weekend, with worshippers usually starting the celebration of Christ's resurrection at midnight.
 All the animals that originally arrived on these islands got here by swimming, flying, or being washed ashore.
 Due to the great distance from the mainland, mammals could not reach the islands, making the giant tortoise the main herbivore on the Galapagos Islands.
 Since the arrival of humans to the Galapagos Islands, many mammals have been introduced, including goats, horses, cows, rats, cats, and dogs.
 If you visit the Arctic or Antarctic in winter, you will experience a polar night, when the sun does not rise above the horizon.
 This is a good opportunity to see the northern lights, because the sky will be more or less dark all day.
 Since these areas are sparsely populated, and as a result, light pollution is often not a problem, you will also be able to enjoy the stars.
 Japanese work culture is more hierarchical and formal than what Westerners are used to.
 Suits are standard business attire, and colleagues address each other by their last name or by their title.
 Harmony in the workplace is extremely important, and the results of group work are valued above individual achievements.
 Usually, employees must obtain permission from the boss before making any decisions and are required to obey the boss's orders unquestioningly.
Results bleu: {'bleu': 0.3676095891223246, 'precisions': [0.6713790659210838, 0.42867689278976295, 0.2984167736414206, 0.21263082565524644], 'brevity_penalty': 1.0, 'length_ratio': 1.027223817806723, 'translation_length': 25394, 'reference_length': 24721} results chrF: {'score': 63.37175896597398, 'char_order': 6, 'word_order': 0, 'beta': 2} results comet:{'mean_score': 0.8663150517365678, 'scores': [0.8277550339698792, 0.8605800271034241, 0.8903278708457947, 0.8138316869735718, 0.9083125591278076, 0.7499575018882751, 0.8724570870399475, 0.8730815052986145, 0.9085701107978821, 0.9232858419418335, 0.8902595043182373, 0.8749357461929321, 0.9131118059158325, 0.8884519934654236, 0.8673226833343506, 0.8538296818733215, 0.8736357688903809, 0.887681245803833, 0.9020951390266418, 0.8183377385139465, 0.9251278638839722, 0.9449964165687561, 0.8228154182434082, 0.8890276551246643, 0.8829353451728821, 0.9043156504631042, 0.8200926780700684, 0.8725143074989319, 0.8517126441001892, 0.842606782913208, 0.8117002844810486, 0.8143870234489441, 0.7915404438972473, 0.8744825720787048, 0.9219344854354858, 0.8677168488502502, 0.8908526301383972, 0.8837735056877136, 0.8989983201026917, 0.859221875667572, 0.8813366293907166, 0.9007454514503479, 0.9143818616867065, 0.8932040929794312, 0.8501113653182983, 0.8803097605705261, 0.9106904864311218, 0.90469890832901, 0.911069393157959, 0.8850354552268982, 0.9241733551025391, 0.890440046787262, 0.8905381560325623, 0.8901221752166748, 0.8908576369285583, 0.9036708474159241, 0.8859132528305054, 0.8585631847381592, 0.8623828887939453, 0.9399698376655579, 0.8606128096580505, 0.8960214257240295, 0.8460797667503357, 0.8966021537780762, 0.8683049082756042, 0.8221657872200012, 0.8749505877494812, 0.7000593543052673, 0.9321784973144531, 0.8885255455970764, 0.8462310433387756, 0.8383325934410095, 0.7651730179786682, 0.874826967716217, 0.8513213992118835, 0.8551052212715149, 0.8724128603935242, 0.9107529520988464, 0.9539265632629395, 0.8829948306083679, 0.7668647170066833, 0.89168781042099, 0.8450999855995178, 0.8370283842086792, 0.8859372735023499, 0.8898885846138, 0.8448438048362732, 0.8631157279014587, 0.890239417552948, 0.8718821406364441, 0.7914112210273743, 0.8881528973579407, 0.8552135229110718, 0.9321164488792419, 0.9041489958763123, 0.8846638798713684, 0.8697683215141296, 0.7940110564231873, 0.880607545375824, 0.8645192980766296, 0.9006214737892151, 0.8397018313407898, 0.8825463652610779, 0.9476808905601501, 0.9042448997497559, 0.785965621471405, 0.8341215252876282, 0.8656747341156006, 0.8280647993087769, 0.8037600517272949, 0.8841239213943481, 0.9256681799888611, 0.947735071182251, 0.8925075531005859, 0.8917219042778015, 0.8814414143562317, 0.8899433612823486, 0.8999904990196228, 0.9553102254867554, 0.9146965146064758, 0.808961808681488, 0.8663448691368103, 0.8896656632423401, 0.8996562957763672, 0.8810194134712219, 0.915727972984314, 0.8827378153800964, 0.8851940035820007, 0.8693484663963318, 0.867406964302063, 0.8711967468261719, 0.8847886919975281, 0.8855500221252441, 0.9140405654907227, 0.7390518188476562, 0.8065826296806335, 0.8487067818641663, 0.8944495320320129, 0.8793379664421082, 0.8609640598297119, 0.9085409641265869, 0.8089437484741211, 0.881614625453949, 0.8700127601623535, 0.8725069761276245, 0.8860521912574768, 0.909490704536438, 0.9195556044578552, 0.8690780401229858, 0.9062111973762512, 0.8621953725814819, 0.8723616003990173, 0.829663872718811, 0.806448757648468, 0.8554008603096008, 0.8718270659446716, 0.8586553931236267, 0.7896521091461182, 0.8878677487373352, 0.8526350855827332, 0.8869664669036865, 0.8357047438621521, 0.8841826319694519, 0.8960571885108948, 0.7887746691703796, 0.8348124623298645, 0.8702271580696106, 0.8647772669792175, 0.8241674900054932, 0.8748457431793213, 0.8408764600753784, 0.9410963654518127, 0.8863524794578552, 0.8899269104003906, 0.8857676386833191, 0.9017629027366638, 0.8627812266349792, 0.9081458449363708, 0.7843738198280334, 0.8896111845970154, 0.894446074962616, 0.8556072115898132, 0.9045020937919617, 0.9225015044212341, 0.8369032144546509, 0.924943745136261, 0.9445075392723083, 0.8800140619277954, 0.8308117985725403, 0.893049418926239, 0.7159668207168579, 0.905265212059021, 0.8546110391616821, 0.8411599397659302, 0.8587777018547058, 0.916941225528717, 0.8730658888816833, 0.8191251754760742, 0.8834760785102844, 0.843054473400116, 0.8181851506233215, 0.8542373776435852, 0.8097869157791138, 0.7979854941368103, 0.8762475848197937, 0.9013989567756653, 0.8764570951461792, 0.8742668032646179, 0.9192783236503601, 0.91886967420578, 0.8822173476219177, 0.8980260491371155, 0.9295561909675598, 0.923148512840271, 0.8800802826881409, 0.9059379696846008, 0.9218893647193909, 0.9211374521255493, 0.8762935996055603, 0.9190685749053955, 0.9240351319313049, 0.8478735685348511, 0.9104884266853333, 0.8835216164588928, 0.9195829033851624, 0.904427170753479, 0.8859812617301941, 0.8244330286979675, 0.9126849174499512, 0.7772471308708191, 0.9405012726783752, 0.8387224674224854, 0.8290877938270569, 0.8901762366294861, 0.8269795775413513, 0.8521535396575928, 0.8762357234954834, 0.8652294278144836, 0.9071952104568481, 0.9083338975906372, 0.8015798926353455, 0.7496710419654846, 0.8645055890083313, 0.88036048412323, 0.8910688161849976, 0.8887725472450256, 0.8108533024787903, 0.791200578212738, 0.8602468371391296, 0.8893014788627625, 0.8862065076828003, 0.9047538638114929, 0.868574857711792, 0.9045841097831726, 0.9382864832878113, 0.9005095958709717, 0.9013670086860657, 0.9084776043891907, 0.8677203059196472, 0.8240841031074524, 0.9374816417694092, 0.8600967526435852, 0.9288665056228638, 0.7740501165390015, 0.92270427942276, 0.8752277493476868, 0.8163978457450867, 0.8607040047645569, 0.9008346199989319, 0.8795754313468933, 0.8338332772254944, 0.8041889071464539, 0.8780688047409058, 0.7841928601264954, 0.7994107604026794, 0.7885943651199341, 0.8315846920013428, 0.9169398546218872, 0.8754650950431824, 0.8615346550941467, 0.8547170162200928, 0.8606310486793518, 0.925178050994873, 0.9184790253639221, 0.9040518403053284, 0.9318849444389343, 0.8491949439048767, 0.8468524813652039, 0.8874951601028442, 0.9094326496124268, 0.8606166243553162, 0.8441275358200073, 0.8751955032348633, 0.8829137682914734, 0.815727174282074, 0.841854989528656, 0.8508678674697876, 0.912615954875946, 0.7218559384346008, 0.8868079781532288, 0.8994740843772888, 0.8643587827682495, 0.880903959274292, 0.8846678733825684, 0.8598867654800415, 0.9058077335357666, 0.831366240978241, 0.8472347259521484, 0.8938174843788147, 0.8879873156547546, 0.9650487303733826, 0.9363221526145935, 0.8714884519577026, 0.7183541655540466, 0.9526802897453308, 0.8781356811523438, 0.8827649354934692, 0.7765776515007019, 0.8266212344169617, 0.7604359984397888, 0.8029652237892151, 0.7701908349990845, 0.8983968496322632, 0.8516111373901367, 0.9157990217208862, 0.8416746258735657, 0.8560835123062134, 0.8182265162467957, 0.8997651934623718, 0.8498312830924988, 0.9051873087882996, 0.8653877377510071, 0.9366506934165955, 0.9079526662826538, 0.9398060441017151, 0.8647809624671936, 0.8868010640144348, 0.7733641862869263, 0.8595232963562012, 0.8697123527526855, 0.8137027621269226, 0.7356968522071838, 0.8470520377159119, 0.7950462698936462, 0.9132652878761292, 0.9047913551330566, 0.8875343203544617, 0.8907225728034973, 0.7709598541259766, 0.8278647065162659, 0.8583863377571106, 0.8596862554550171, 0.8940877318382263, 0.9313384890556335, 0.9235438704490662, 0.9050278067588806, 0.8888128995895386, 0.8751352429389954, 0.8688257336616516, 0.8667084574699402, 0.8535893559455872, 0.8760273456573486, 0.9513667225837708, 0.8286809921264648, 0.8875737190246582, 0.8579663038253784, 0.8139116764068604, 0.8849999904632568, 0.8136017918586731, 0.8452675342559814, 0.8009103536605835, 0.782151997089386, 0.8719494938850403, 0.8953688144683838, 0.9296338558197021, 0.9177072644233704, 0.8972756266593933, 0.9163047671318054, 0.8470188975334167, 0.8408381938934326, 0.9201250672340393, 0.8750949501991272, 0.7983689904212952, 0.7925477623939514, 0.8691327571868896, 0.8500076532363892, 0.7827432155609131, 0.8894948363304138, 0.8250594139099121, 0.8877297043800354, 0.878250777721405, 0.8987177610397339, 0.8402750492095947, 0.9447852969169617, 0.9196286201477051, 0.8533713817596436, 0.7774224877357483, 0.9716050624847412, 0.8174263834953308, 0.9322370290756226, 0.9061376452445984, 0.8514371514320374, 0.9211412072181702, 0.8347798585891724, 0.8736850619316101, 0.830955982208252, 0.8267430663108826, 0.858442485332489, 0.932095468044281, 0.870891273021698, 0.8081028461456299, 0.8195043206214905, 0.8522700667381287, 0.9046760201454163, 0.8828209638595581, 0.8726410269737244, 0.843773365020752, 0.8197991251945496, 0.9032683968544006, 0.9271469116210938, 0.856135368347168, 0.899285614490509, 0.8656930923461914, 0.8251622319221497, 0.8719109296798706, 0.9141823649406433, 0.8758535981178284, 0.9222421646118164, 0.9208006262779236, 0.9239820837974548, 0.8589178919792175, 0.8552244305610657, 0.8523603677749634, 0.824090301990509, 0.8354931473731995, 0.8537531495094299, 0.8712208271026611, 0.9341209530830383, 0.8861755728721619, 0.8835055828094482, 0.8918634057044983, 0.8989127278327942, 0.9309132695198059, 0.900877833366394, 0.8715140223503113, 0.8638685345649719, 0.8766006827354431, 0.8727558255195618, 0.8818958401679993, 0.8543952703475952, 0.8719738125801086, 0.8484959006309509, 0.9036074280738831, 0.8557538390159607, 0.8842748999595642, 0.7901925444602966, 0.789082944393158, 0.9168862700462341, 0.8756433129310608, 0.8498535752296448, 0.9184980392456055, 0.8167193531990051, 0.8008503913879395, 0.9046176671981812, 0.8839145302772522, 0.864100456237793, 0.8780242800712585, 0.6981785893440247, 0.841242790222168, 0.7975430488586426, 0.7203724980354309, 0.7535192370414734, 0.8544042706489563, 0.7815993428230286, 0.7665036916732788, 0.9031021595001221, 0.8574680685997009, 0.8911591172218323, 0.8954601883888245, 0.9247934222221375, 0.8532423377037048, 0.866192638874054, 0.860471785068512, 0.8558538556098938, 0.8823433518409729, 0.8755140900611877, 0.8770841956138611, 0.86017906665802, 0.8950359225273132, 0.8972028493881226, 0.8669255375862122, 0.8679190874099731, 0.9331914186477661, 0.9009736776351929, 0.8807521462440491, 0.8424707651138306, 0.8759203553199768, 0.8551738858222961, 0.9148843288421631, 0.8440981507301331, 0.8033304810523987, 0.9434038996696472, 0.9110350608825684, 0.8571166396141052, 0.8056538701057434, 0.8452183604240417, 0.8230975866317749, 0.8517847657203674, 0.8153067231178284, 0.872961699962616, 0.8106442093849182, 0.7687453031539917, 0.8523787260055542, 0.6398391127586365, 0.8518894910812378, 0.911898672580719, 0.8624331951141357, 0.9692941904067993, 0.8205555081367493, 0.8759361505508423, 0.8847969174385071, 0.9208361506462097, 0.881931722164154, 0.8701996803283691, 0.7484884858131409, 0.8983547687530518, 0.9016211032867432, 0.8074239492416382, 0.8426406979560852, 0.888921856880188, 0.8327718377113342, 0.8780906796455383, 0.8327876925468445, 0.8621445298194885, 0.8992553353309631, 0.8517482280731201, 0.8405369520187378, 0.8392833471298218, 0.8221173882484436, 0.9235126376152039, 0.8700323700904846, 0.9099629521369934, 0.8683931231498718, 0.8673243522644043, 0.8838778734207153, 0.9153214693069458, 0.8942909240722656, 0.8981574177742004, 0.8485814929008484, 0.8964346647262573, 0.8233557343482971, 0.8854190111160278, 0.8635347485542297, 0.8606236577033997, 0.9344199299812317, 0.7742970585823059, 0.8136324286460876, 0.7964523434638977, 0.8240379095077515, 0.7962573170661926, 0.893990695476532, 0.8872997164726257, 0.8409183621406555, 0.6576799154281616, 0.8781813979148865, 0.874707818031311, 0.84942227602005, 0.8711786270141602, 0.8641685247421265, 0.8632330298423767, 0.9365269541740417, 0.8979920744895935, 0.8103827834129333, 0.8943986892700195, 0.8581272959709167, 0.817358672618866, 0.8567578196525574, 0.9074195623397827, 0.9170942902565002, 0.8721405863761902, 0.9114684462547302, 0.9391964077949524, 0.842776358127594, 0.8488765358924866, 0.8104012608528137, 0.8641026616096497, 0.8461877703666687, 0.8309609293937683, 0.844392716884613, 0.9188410639762878, 0.8501023650169373, 0.914121687412262, 0.8648503422737122, 0.905567467212677, 0.8859949707984924, 0.9032080769538879, 0.9029971361160278, 0.8937716484069824, 0.8790104985237122, 0.9083002209663391, 0.8529803156852722, 0.7364715933799744, 0.8859859108924866, 0.8661004900932312, 0.8284294605255127, 0.8955848813056946, 0.8135388493537903, 0.8034245371818542, 0.7809728980064392, 0.8510467410087585, 0.8916105031967163, 0.8977529406547546, 0.9002314805984497, 0.8490893840789795, 0.8344114422798157, 0.847058892250061, 0.9236460328102112, 0.9188365340232849, 0.886979341506958, 0.859557569026947, 0.8603323698043823, 0.8092703819274902, 0.9044250845909119, 0.8775517344474792, 0.8723775744438171, 0.9079118967056274, 0.9235058426856995, 0.9211990237236023, 0.9026361107826233, 0.8812261819839478, 0.795536458492279, 0.8643984198570251, 0.9481451511383057, 0.9330634474754333, 0.9443759322166443, 0.8652098774909973, 0.9153204560279846, 0.8733165860176086, 0.9304558038711548, 0.9404090642929077, 0.8994752168655396, 0.9465324282646179, 0.8741648197174072, 0.8987464308738708, 0.8211290240287781, 0.8048529028892517, 0.7969750761985779, 0.8546897768974304, 0.8610419631004333, 0.8774999976158142, 0.9542608261108398, 0.8222182393074036, 0.8372144103050232, 0.800309956073761, 0.888486921787262, 0.8788205981254578, 0.8547053933143616, 0.8391619920730591, 0.7908505797386169, 0.842596709728241, 0.8348246216773987, 0.9383130669593811, 0.9292359948158264, 0.9154377579689026, 0.9549419283866882, 0.8304978013038635, 0.9147526621818542, 0.8787555694580078, 0.8115576505661011, 0.8992109894752502, 0.8302244544029236, 0.9118550419807434, 0.9067702293395996, 0.8786022067070007, 0.8755246996879578, 0.885844886302948, 0.8958412408828735, 0.8751301169395447, 0.8519055247306824, 0.9530267715454102, 0.8319175243377686, 0.8426643013954163, 0.8739268183708191, 0.8490641117095947, 0.8726223111152649, 0.7967607975006104, 0.8650456070899963, 0.8646218180656433, 0.8985286951065063, 0.8624128103256226, 0.9067961573600769, 0.8869479298591614, 0.8090054392814636, 0.8540936708450317, 0.8475255966186523, 0.9120656847953796, 0.8726524710655212, 0.9277350306510925, 0.8239254355430603, 0.9287849068641663, 0.8405395150184631, 0.8754168152809143, 0.9384713768959045, 0.8665147423744202, 0.8595792651176453, 0.7609743475914001, 0.7281439900398254, 0.9054839015007019, 0.8082615733146667, 0.8650290966033936, 0.9357656240463257, 0.8565948009490967, 0.9073598980903625, 0.8704435229301453, 0.8654925227165222, 0.7650232911109924, 0.8548864722251892, 0.8598970770835876, 0.899122416973114, 0.8882612586021423, 0.8084468841552734, 0.7902868390083313, 0.8612631559371948, 0.8944435715675354, 0.8965982794761658, 0.893140435218811, 0.8404521942138672, 0.8628053069114685, 0.7924564480781555, 0.7512660622596741, 0.8691890835762024, 0.9060825705528259, 0.8579110503196716, 0.9185922741889954, 0.8971690535545349, 0.8954576253890991, 0.8970634341239929, 0.8471666574478149, 0.8938885927200317, 0.8304727673530579, 0.75876384973526, 0.8715360164642334, 0.8760234117507935, 0.8743014931678772, 0.9171207547187805, 0.8993465304374695, 0.8937526345252991, 0.8616889119148254, 0.9160754680633545, 0.8963021636009216, 0.8627105355262756, 0.9002271890640259, 0.8239043951034546, 0.8664231896400452, 0.8755442500114441, 0.9038668870925903, 0.8754774928092957, 0.887928307056427, 0.8493322134017944, 0.9040288925170898, 0.8926169872283936, 0.9160643815994263, 0.9290104508399963, 0.869113564491272, 0.814986526966095, 0.9126721024513245, 0.8962991237640381, 0.8813906311988831, 0.9172012209892273, 0.9677184224128723, 0.904154896736145, 0.8937755227088928, 0.846767783164978, 0.8848701119422913, 0.8659675121307373, 0.8345180749893188, 0.7495642900466919, 0.9074694514274597, 0.8961572051048279, 0.8031855821609497, 0.9035045504570007, 0.7730225920677185, 0.8996994495391846, 0.8676833510398865, 0.9077448844909668, 0.7068264484405518, 0.9209540486335754, 0.8719083666801453, 0.8392323851585388, 0.8630674481391907, 0.8921554684638977, 0.8892663717269897, 0.8587197661399841, 0.865437388420105, 0.878128707408905, 0.891523540019989, 0.9582968950271606, 0.8000470399856567, 0.9035088419914246, 0.8055036664009094, 0.8572750687599182, 0.8260862827301025, 0.8755701184272766, 0.8637157678604126, 0.8429642915725708, 0.8701485991477966, 0.894449770450592, 0.8900261521339417, 0.8657774329185486, 0.8500477075576782, 0.9265769124031067, 0.842968761920929, 0.8835151791572571, 0.8753533959388733, 0.8742426037788391, 0.8708872199058533, 0.8484672904014587, 0.8454816341400146, 0.8288025856018066, 0.8595016598701477, 0.9346435070037842, 0.881793737411499, 0.8590660691261292, 0.848232626914978, 0.9188379645347595, 0.8760210871696472, 0.8724648356437683, 0.8601840138435364, 0.9045329689979553, 0.8780842423439026, 0.8898265957832336, 0.8726933598518372, 0.824368953704834, 0.8249571919441223, 0.8303213715553284, 0.6853696703910828, 0.8651760816574097, 0.9036099910736084, 0.856213390827179, 0.8832789063453674, 0.8335302472114563, 0.8404426574707031, 0.7923475503921509, 0.8235455751419067, 0.757969319820404, 0.8869455456733704, 0.7635872960090637, 0.8483904600143433, 0.7928664088249207, 0.8778008818626404, 0.8325139284133911, 0.9317160844802856, 0.9087914824485779, 0.8156748414039612, 0.7191149592399597, 0.6580934524536133, 0.8025880455970764, 0.8949840068817139, 0.8675376772880554, 0.9063080549240112, 0.8557503819465637, 0.8912388682365417, 0.8674205541610718, 0.89833003282547, 0.863144040107727, 0.8153000473976135, 0.814035952091217, 0.9043683409690857, 0.8838568925857544, 0.8900132775306702, 0.8622293472290039, 0.8256812691688538, 0.9024270176887512, 0.9092960953712463, 0.8785357475280762, 0.8731591105461121, 0.9055241942405701, 0.8849202394485474, 0.9532590508460999, 0.8070582151412964, 0.8690986633300781, 0.8912861943244934, 0.9059633612632751, 0.8827663064002991, 0.8395383954048157, 0.8609861731529236, 0.8896026015281677, 0.8635682463645935, 0.7435492873191833, 0.835051953792572, 0.8935835361480713, 0.8751155734062195, 0.8489994406700134, 0.703745424747467, 0.8468621373176575, 0.8873687386512756, 0.8838357925415039, 0.8598049283027649, 0.8776832818984985, 0.9065011143684387, 0.8276205062866211, 0.9000524878501892, 0.8291030526161194, 0.7993322610855103, 0.8483344912528992, 0.873279333114624, 0.5279989242553711, 0.8052115440368652, 0.7835776805877686, 0.9246193766593933, 0.894256055355072, 0.8313198685646057, 0.8631758093833923, 0.9076840877532959, 0.8932396769523621, 0.8562141060829163, 0.805428147315979, 0.8760112524032593, 0.774694561958313, 0.8486692905426025, 0.8797675967216492, 0.8356539607048035, 0.8951905369758606, 0.7827979922294617, 0.8821397423744202, 0.8857903480529785, 0.8743253946304321, 0.886931836605072, 0.8672348856925964, 0.8178002238273621, 0.8784079551696777, 0.878420352935791, 0.8139079213142395, 0.8627516031265259, 0.8211098313331604, 0.8817365765571594, 0.8869689106941223, 0.9323479533195496, 0.9117293357849121, 0.9161748290061951, 0.902272641658783, 0.9580382704734802, 0.9149757027626038, 0.8855434060096741, 0.8649213314056396, 0.8153508305549622, 0.8112314343452454, 0.8659010529518127, 0.7308641076087952, 0.9120916724205017, 0.8082777857780457, 0.7480719685554504, 0.8709139227867126, 0.9199461340904236, 0.8380700349807739, 0.9181250929832458, 0.8959989547729492, 0.9220582842826843, 0.8872824311256409, 0.9225395321846008, 0.7892674207687378, 0.8336504101753235, 0.9024410843849182, 0.8249640464782715, 0.9017444252967834, 0.8550302386283875, 0.8640971779823303, 0.8047040700912476, 0.8548914790153503, 0.798482358455658, 0.9024698138237, 0.8428716063499451, 0.8161863088607788, 0.8200535774230957, 0.8621811270713806, 0.9125248789787292, 0.8532752394676208, 0.8263725638389587, 0.9246523976325989, 0.8160505890846252, 0.8521820902824402, 0.8584017753601074, 0.9087720513343811, 0.8687151670455933, 0.9242432713508606, 0.7948215007781982, 0.8694048523902893, 0.8758450150489807, 0.8275015950202942, 0.7555572390556335, 0.9049127101898193, 0.8707223534584045, 0.9092153906822205, 0.8810268044471741, 0.8963676691055298, 0.8702347874641418, 0.9186764359474182, 0.9397193789482117, 0.9193105101585388, 0.826587438583374, 0.9022545218467712, 0.8404313921928406, 0.861053466796875, 0.7968989014625549, 0.9070439338684082, 0.8979770541191101, 0.8105635046958923, 0.9141348600387573, 0.9410990476608276, 0.8914330005645752, 0.8716788291931152, 0.8523403406143188]}